http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/STEM_CELLS?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT 8:04 PM EDT Dems Plan Vote on Stem Cell Research AP-Ipsos Poll: Bush and Congress Democrats Seek to Overturn Pay Ruling GOP Fear Fallout From New Ethics Probes Dems Plan Vote on Stem Cell Research Congresswoman's Baby Has Down Syndrome House Members Under Investigation The 110th Congress' First 100 Hours Sen. Max Baucus: The AP Interview Mark Foley Scandal Timeline Harry Reid Land Deal Congressional Leadership Financial Disclosure Harry Reid's Ties to Abramoff DeLay and Blunt: Following the Money Congress Goes to Bat for Tribes Plan Vote on Stem Cell Research intends to send President Bush legislation next week to ease restrictions on federally funded embryonic stem cell research, inviting his second veto in as many years on the subject. As was the case last year, Bush appears likely to make his veto stick. Several Democratic officials, speaking on condition of anonymity, said Wednesday that supporters of the bill appear to lack the two-thirds majority needed to override him. Rep. Diana DeGette, D-Colo., a leading advocate of the legislation, did not dispute that assessment in an interview. "If he does veto it again it will just show his complete unwillingness to look at this research that holds the potential for cure of these diseases," she said. Both houses passed legislation on the subject earlier in the year. The final vote is expected Thursday in the House. Public opinion polls show strong support for the research, and it could return as an issue in the 2008 elections. Supporters of the research say it holds great promise in the quest for treatments of Alzheimer's and other illnesses. Critics counter that it is immoral because it involves the destruction of human embryos. In threatening a veto this year Bush said it "crossed a moral line that I and many others find troubling." There was no federal money for the work until Bush announced on Aug. 9, 2001, that his administration would make it available for lines of stem cells that were in existence. Elected with the strong support of abortion foes and other conservatives, he said at the time his decision was designed to balance concerns about "protecting life and improving life." He also limited the funds to cell lines derived from embryos that were surplus at fertility clinics, and that had been donated from adults who had given informed consent. Bush vetoed legislation to allow funding of additional lines of embryonic stem cells last year when it passed over the objections of Republicans then in control. Democrats made the legislation a top priority when they took control of the House and Senate in January. The House approved an initial measure within days of convening on a 253-174 vote was short of a veto-proof majority. The Senate passed a slightly different measure in April, 63-34, a margin that suggested supporters were one vote short of two-thirds. DeGette said the change inserted into the bill in the Senate encourages the federal government to conduct research into alternative therapies.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BUSH?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Bush Calls for Global Emissions Goals AP White House Correspondent Bush Asks for Global Emission Goals by 2008 Latest White House Headlines Bush Calls for Global Emissions Goals Bush Sees South Korea Model for Iraq Bush Raises $675,000 for the NJ GOP Bush, Putin Plan July Meeting in Maine Bush Taps Zoellick to Lead World Bank Bush, seeking to blunt international criticism of the U.S. record on climate change, on Thursday urged 15 major nations to agree by the end of next year on a global emissions goal for reducing greenhouse gases. Bush called for the first in a series of meetings to begin this fall, bringing together countries identified as major emitters of greenhouse gases blamed for global warming. The list would include the United States, China, India and major European countries. The president outlined his proposal in a speech ahead of next week's summit in Germany of leading industrialized nations, where global warming is to be a major topic and Bush will be on the spot. The United States has refused to ratify the landmark 1997 Kyoto Protocol requiring industrialized countries to reduce greenhouse gases to 1990 levels by 2012. Developing countries, including China and India, were exempted from that first round of cuts. Bush rejected the Kyoto approach, as well as the latest German proposal for what happens after 2012. "The United States takes this issue seriously," Bush said. "The new initiative I'm outlining today will contribute to the important dialogue that will take place in Germany next week." Along with his call for a global emissions goal, Bush urged other nations to eliminate tariffs on clean energy technologies. Germany, which holds the European Union and Group of Eight presidencies, is proposing a so-called "2-degree" target, whereby global temperatures would be allowed to increase no more than 2 degrees Celsius - the equivalent of 3.6 degrees Fahrenheit - before being brought back down. Practically, experts have said that means a global reduction in emissions of 50 percent below 1990 levels by 2050. Instead, Bush called for nations to hold a series of meetings, beginning this fall, to set a global emissions goal. Each nation then would have to decide on how to achieve the goal, White House officials said. "The United States will work with other nations to establish a new framework for greenhouse gas emissions for when the Kyoto Protocol expires in 2012," the president said. "So my proposal is this: By the end of next year, America and other nations will set a long-term global goal for reducing greenhouse gases. To develop this goal, the United States will convene a series of meetings of nations that produce the most greenhouse gasses, including nations with rapidly growing economies like India and China. "Each country would establish midterm management targets and programs that reflect their own mix of energy sources and future energy needs," he said. "In the course of the next 18 months, our nations will bring together industry leaders from different sectors of our economies, such as power generation, and alternative fuels and transportation." Bush's critics were quick to respond, even before the president's speech had concluded. Daniel J. Weiss, climate strategy director for the liberal Center for American Progress, said the Bush administration has a "do-nothing" policy on global warming despite U.S. allies' best efforts to spur U.S. reductions. "Our allies' pleas for action add to the voices of many big corporations such as Dow, Shell, General Electric, and General Motors," Weiss said. "These and other Fortune 500 companies endorsed a 60 percent to 80 percent reduction in global warming pollution by 2050, the level scientists indicate that we must reach to stave off the worst impacts. Unfortunately, these appeals from his foreign and corporate allies continue to fall on President Bush's deaf ears." The U.S. last year actually experienced a drop in emissions of carbon dioxide, the heat-trapping gas most blamed for global warming. The 1.3 percent decline from 2005, the first drop in 11 years, was due to a mild winter followed by a cool summer. Carbon dioxide is produced from burning fossil fuels, including natural gas and coal, which are used widely to produce electricity to heat homes in winter and run air conditioners in summer. While Bush announced his new proposal, the administration registered its opposition to a number of approaches to combat global warming. Specifically, the White House said it does not support a global carbon-trading program allowing countries to buy and sell carbon credits to meet limits on carbon dioxide levels. The White House also expressed opposition to energy efficiency targets advocated by the EU, arguing that a standard applicable in one country does not fit another.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CALIFORNIA_2008_CANDIDATES?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Presidential Hopefuls Campaign in Calif. AP Photo/Marcio Jose Sanchez Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand BURLINGAME, Calif. (AP) -- Republican presidential candidate Rudy Giuliani on Wednesday declared that California's early primary has made the state more than a political ATM - just as he accepted a check from a supporter and then headed to two fundraisers. California's Feb. 5 presidential primary seemed to be having a modest effect, with several major candidates blending their fundraising chores with campaign stops to greet potential voters. Mostly, however, the focus was on fundraising. Democrats John Edwards and Hillary Rodham Clinton also trolled the nation's most delegate-rich state for cash and votes Wednesday. Between them, the three candidates held six California money events. Edwards, during an appearance between the four fundraisers he is holding over two days, decried the influence of money on politics and called for public financing of campaigns. "I'm not holier-than-thou about this. I've raised millions of dollars in 2004 and now to run for president," he added. "But that doesn't mean I think the system is good, because I don't." Giuliani stepped off a plane at San Francisco International Airport and promptly went to the Broadway Grill a few minutes away to chat with customers. His campaign ensured the lunchtime visit was stacked with supporters, sending out an e-mail Wednesday morning urging them to stop by the cafe en route to the fundraiser. Those crowded into the restaurant appeared to be a mix of regulars in T-shirts and committed supporters clad in suits and ties and bound for the fundraiser, which cost $250 and up. George Yerby handed the candidate a check for $200 on the spot. Giuliani hastily passed it to an aide. "He's going to be the next president," Yerby, 67, who lives in the wealthy Bay area enclave of Hillsborough, said afterward. "I hope." Giuliani closed his fundraisers here and in Beverly Hills to the public and news media. The restaurant stop, where he sipped orange juice and coffee, was open. He acknowledged to reporters outside the grill that raising money "has always been a big focus in California, like it was in New York." "One of the complaints that New Yorkers have had, and that Californians have had, is 'They come here, they take our money, but they don't campaign here.'," he said. "So now, they're going to get both - they're going to get us coming here and trying to get your money, but also coming here and campaigning." California is one of 15 states to move its primary to Feb. 5, and others are considering it. Its primary for state candidates will remain in June 2008. Giuliani promised to return regularly if he captures the GOP presidential nomination. "I think I'm the one Republican candidate who has a legitimate chance of winning California. That's based on the polls," he said. A Field Poll of California voters in March suggested otherwise. It showed GOP rival Sen. John McCain running stronger against Edwards and Clinton in hypothetical head-to-head matchups. McCain and Giuliani trailed Democratic candidate Barack Obama by identical margins, and also were behind Clinton and Edwards. Edwards headlined a fundraiser in San Francisco on Wednesday, headed to a second one Wednesday evening in the Bay area suburb of Atherton and planned two more Thursday. During an appearance at the headquarters of search-engine leader Google, Edwards said the current system of paying for campaigns is "dysfunctional." "The way we finance political campaigns in this country, it couldn't be more unhealthy," Edwards told about 1,000 Google employees. He called for taxpayer-financed campaigns - the only way, he said, to "literally pull the life out of these big groups - people that have a huge presence in Washington, lobbying groups." The former senator from North Carolina was the fourth presidential candidate to submit to questioning by executives and staffers of Google. Clinton, meanwhile, held two fundraisers in the Los Angeles area, one hosted by director Steven Spielberg.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/F/FRED_THOMPSON?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT 11:47 PM EDT Thompson Moves Toward White House Bid Actor Thompson Inches Toward White House Bid Thompson, the former Tennessee senator and "Law & Order" actor, is taking significant steps toward an expected summer entry into the crowded but extraordinarily unsettled Republican presidential race. His likely candidacy could give restless conservatives somewhere to turn. A crucial bloc of the GOP, those voters have not fully embraced the leading contenders, giving Thompson what his backers argue is an opening for a "true conservative" who can triumph in November 2008. The 64-year-old Southerner would bring a right-leaning Senate voting record with a few digressions from GOP orthd odoxy and a dash of Hollywood star power given his many movie roles and TV stint as the gruff district attorney on NBC's popular crime drama. On Wednesday, Thompson asked to be released from his role of playing a prosecutor on the TV series "Law & Order." The show's executive producer, Dick Wolf, said Thompson told him he "has not made a firm decision about his political future" but that he was concerned about "the creative and scheduling constraints of the upcoming season." A Thompson bid also could make the contest to succeed President Bush even more topsy turvy; all three top-tier candidates - Rudy Giuliani, John McCain and Mitt Romney - could lose some measure of support and the seven underdogs could become even more irrelevant. Thompson will make his first formal campaign move in the coming days, establishing an official organization to weigh a White House bid while launching a major fundraising drive on Monday, according to several Republicans with knowledge of his plans. Speaking on condition of anonymity because the timeline is not public, these officials said Thompson may visit early primary states in late June and could officially enter the race as early as the first week in July. "Senator Thompson is still seriously considering getting into the presidential contest and he is doing everything he has to do to make that final decision," said Mark Corallo, a Thompson spokesman. "Stay tuned." On Thompson's schedule in the coming weeks: a speech to Virginia Republicans in Richmond on Saturday and an appearance with Jay Leno on "The Tonight Show" on June 12. One official said an overseas trip also may be in the works. For months, Thompson has openly flirted with a candidacy as a Tennessee-based effort sought to draft him into the race. He made several high-profile moves that pointed to a bid, not the least of which was disclosing that he is in remission after being diagnosed with non-Hodgkins lymphoma, a form of cancer. His popularity in national polls spiked to double digits early in the year, but while he still fares well in surveys, his numbers have fallen following what some Republicans considered a subpar speech in early May in California. That's prompted some rumblings in GOP circles that Thompson may have missed his opportunity to make a splash in the race. Undaunted, Thompson has been casting himself as a straight-talking conservative in the mold of former President Reagan in speeches and on the Internet. "He's not Ronald Reagan, but he's Reaganesque," said Ted Malloch of Palm Beach, Fla., the chief executive of a consulting firm who is supporting Thompson. "Fred is unique in the sense that all the boxes have been checked." During his 1994-2002 Senate tenure, he was considered a reliably conservative vote. He worked to limit the role of the federal government and backed a ban on a late-term abortion procedure. He voted in favor of Bush's tax cuts, oil drilling in the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge, eliminating money for the National Endowment for the Arts and a constitutional amendment to ban flag desecration. And, he voted against requiring criminal background checks for purchases at gun shows. But he sometimes took paths that didn't necessarily sit well with conservatives, including advocating for campaign finance reform. While he voted to oust President Clinton from office, he also was one of 10 Republican senators who voted against one of the two impeachment charges. Social issues, important to the party's right, also typically weren't at the top of his agenda. He was known less as a legislator and more as an investigator, leading the committee that examined former President Clinton's fundraising in 1996. Yet, he established a reputation as a less-than-hard worker. The Democratic National Committee issued a research document Wednesday detailing Thompson's major legislative accomplishments. Save for the title and a DNC disclaimer, it was blank. Thompson was one of the few senators who backed underdog McCain in 2000 over George W. Bush, the establishment candidate. This time around, Thompson would be opposing McCain - and could hurt his friend's own shot at the White House. The two have similar Senate records but Thompson could be seen as a fresher face to McCain, who is well-known to GOP voters. Romney, who is trying to position himself to the right of the major candidates, also could see his support fall among conservatives concerned about his shifts on issues. Campaigning in Iowa, Romney said he welcomed a Thompson entry. "I think he'll make the race more interesting. He's got good ideas and after all, he does put bad people in jail every week on 'Law & Order,'" he said. Giuliani could be hindered as well if Thompson grabs the attention of Republicans uneasy with the former New York City mayor's support for gay and abortion rights. Campaigning in California, Giuliani said he would welcome Thompson, but argued that he was the stronger candidate based on his record of cutting taxes and combatting terrorism as well as his ability to win a general election. Ticking off states that went Democratic in 2004, such as California and New York, Giuliani said, "Those are all states Republicans gave away in the past and the Democrats took for granted. ... It doesn't mean I'll win all of them, but if I win my fair share of them, then I'll get elected." Over the next few days, Thompson plans to form a "testing the waters" committee called "Friends of Fred Thompson," which will allow him to begin raising money, hire staff and gauge support without officially committing to a White House bid. He could significantly dampen the fundraising ability of his potential GOP rivals during the homestretch of the second quarter financial reporting period. "It's going to cause everybody to have second thoughts about writing a check," said Scott Reed, a Republican strategist who is unaligned in the race. Thompson spoke on a conference call Wednesday to several dozen people who officials called "First Day Founders" and said committed to raising money for him. Participants said they were asked to raise $46,000 apiece, the $2,300 maximum from 10 couples or 20 people. Officials cautioned that Thompson has made no final decision.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/O/ON_THE_2008_TRAIL?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT 10:03 PM EDT Dodd, Richardson to Skip Fox Debate Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand presidential candidates Bill Richardson and Chris Dodd will not participate in a Democratic debate co-sponsored by Fox News Channel this fall, joining their three top rivals in bypassing the event. Their decisions, acknowledged by campaign aides Wednesday, is sure to disappoint the Congressional Black Caucus, whose political education and leadership institute is Fox's partner in the debate. But Richardson, the governor of New Mexico, and Dodd, a senator from Connecticut, have been under pressure to shun the debate from liberal groups who say Fox is biased against Democrats. The debate exodus began two months ago when John Edwards became the first candidate to announce that he would not attend the Sept. 23 debate in Detroit. A week later, Sens. Hillary Rodham Clinton and Barack Obama announced they also would not participate. Sen. Joe Biden, D-Del., and Rep. Dennis Kucinich, D-Ohio, have said they intend to be at the debate. Several campaigns have agonized over the decision, especially because of the participation of the Congressional Black Caucus, the group that comprises Congress' black lawmakers, including Obama. But Colorofchange.org, an organization of black online activists, and the liberal MoveOn.org have agitated against Fox with an Internet campaign that includes video excerpts of conservative Fox commentators. MoveOn this week initiated an e-mail campaign urging backers to call Biden's campaign to demand he back out of the debate. "The Congressional Black Caucus represents an important base within the Democratic Party," Biden campaign manager Luis Navarro said. "We think Democratic candidates ought to be willing to respect that." The caucus is co-sponsoring another Democratic debate with CNN in January. No one has indicated they will miss that one. Meanwhile, the Financial Times and the Center on Politics and Foreign Relations at the Johns Hopkins School of Advanced International Studies have been trying to secure commitments from Democratic candidates to participate in a debate next week devoted exclusively to Iraq. Biden, who has been demanding a war-only debate, is the only one so far to say he will attend. Robert Guttman, the director of the center at Johns Hopkins said other campaigns have indicated interest and said some cable news organizations and public television have said they would cover the debate. It is scheduled for 7:30 p.m. EDT Wednesday's at Johns Hopkins' Kenney Auditorium. Guttman said he planned to place chairs on the stage for the candidates, whether they attended or not. "We're ready to roll, with full seats or empty seats," Guttman said. DES MOINES, Iowa (AP) - Republican presidential candidate Mitt Romney on Wednesday repeated his call to add more troops, saying the Iraq war had left the nation's military seriously stressed. The former governor of Massachusetts said he supported President Bush's decision to intervene in Iraq, but conceded that the effort has had plenty of missteps. "I think we've made a number of mistakes," said Romney, opening a two-day campaign trip to Iowa by speaking to a business group. "We were underprepared for what developed. I don't think we had anywhere near enough troops." Romney said he supports adding at least 100,000 troops to the military. The idea of pulling American troops out of Iraq is "very tempting," Romney said, but doing so would lead to a larger conflict in the region. Romney said he was willing to give the president's plan of increasing troops in Iraq time to work, potentially as long as the end of the year. "If it's working we'll all celebrate that," said Romney. Romney was also asked about his effort as governor to broaden health coverage. He said the Massachusetts plan could serve as a model for the nation, but as president he would be reluctant to impose solutions on the states. "My inclination would be to let the states try their own plans," said Romney. "We're going to give them flexibility." Associated Press Writer Mike Glover contributed to this report from Des Moines, Iowa.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/H/HISPANICS_2008?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Endorsement Spotlights Hispanic Vote By MICHAEL R. BLOOD Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand LOS ANGELES (AP) -- Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton's political courtship of Mayor Antonio Villaraigosa landed her an early, influential endorsement this week that highlights the intense competition among presidential candidates for support within the growing Hispanic population. Candidates in both major parties are reaching out to Hispanic voters with an intensity that speaks to the importance of the nation's largest and fastest-growing minority group in the 2008 campaign. Republican Mitt Romney has hired a Spanish-language media adviser in Florida. Democrat Bill Richardson, whose mother is Mexican, has made overt appeals to Hispanic voters, including announcing his candidacy in English and Spanish. Sen. Barack Obama and John Edwards are among the candidates devoting parts of their Web sites to Spanish speakers. And next week, Sen. John McCain will travel to Miami to deliver a speech on immigration, a site chosen in part because of the city's large Hispanic population. "As we've seen in the last few elections, the Hispanic vote has become a critical ... part of the Republican coalition," said Romney aide Alex Burgos. With large Hispanic populations in early voting states like Florida, California and New York, "it takes on even more importance," he said. Hispanics tend to lean Democratic in national elections, but President Bush showed in 2004 that Republicans have much at stake. Bush captured about 40 percent of the Hispanic vote that year, the most ever for a GOP presidential candidate. His Democratic rival, John Kerry, won 53 percent, down from the 62 percent former Vice President Al Gore garnered in 2000. Villaraigosa, a potential gubernatorial candidate in 2010, is one of the nation's most recognized Hispanic politicians. He's expected to serve as a strong advocate for Clinton among Hispanics, particularly in vote-rich Southern California. California's Hispanic population is nearing 36 percent - more than double the U.S. average. However, Hispanics historically vote in numbers well below their share of the population, in part because many are either too young to vote, unregistered or foreign citizens. But as the Hispanic population increases in the state, so has voting participation. In 1992, Hispanics accounted for about 8 percent of Californians going to the polls; in 2006, the figure hit 14 percent, according to figures compiled by the Public Policy Institute of California. Their impact is strongest on the Democratic side of the ticket - one of every five party voters in the state is Hispanic. In the national midterm election in 2006, Democrats recaptured a large part of the Hispanic vote - nearly seven in 10 Hispanic voters supported Democratic congressional candidates, exit polls found. But Republicans in several key states also did well, suggesting Latinos could be important swing voters in 2008. Hispanics could play important roles in potential battleground states like Nevada, Colorado and Arizona, which have large Latino populations. In California "the increasing proportion of Latino adults, greater rates of citizenship and increasing social mobility are all leading to higher proportions of Latinos turning out at the polls," said Public Policy Institute pollster Mark Baldassare. For "Democratic candidates to win, they will need to do well among Latino voters," he added. Not surprisingly, Villaraigosa's endorsement Wednesday was eagerly sought by all the leading Democratic candidates. Clinton landed the nod after a series of phone calls and meetings, which included a New York City dinner between the mayor and former President Bill Clinton. The senator earlier hired a Villaraigosa political adviser to run her California campaign and named state Assembly Speaker Fabian Nunez, a close friend of the mayor and another prominent Hispanic politician, a national co-chair of her campaign. She also appointed Villaraigosa a national co-chair.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/E/EDWARDS_GAS_PRICES?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Edwards Wants Probe of High Gas Prices Analysts: Storms Could Affect Gas Prices BP Shuts 100,000 Barrels of Alaska Oil Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand Latest Photos of John Edwards Edwards Wants Probe of High Gas Prices Edwards Defends Stepped-Up War Opposition Edwards Assails Bush, GOP Rivals Edwards: 'War on Terror' Has Hurt U.S. Edwards Touts Plan to End Iraq Conflict This Week's Gas Prices Around the Nation Interactive: How Gas Prices Are Determined Where Do Your Gas Taxes Go? Take a State-by-State Look SAN FRANCISCO (AP) -- Democratic presidential hopeful John Edwards says a wave of mergers in the oil industry should be investigated by the Justice Department to see what impact they have had on soaring gasoline prices. During a planned campaign stop Thursday in Silicon Valley, Edwards planned to berate the oil industry for "anticompetitive actions" and outline an energy plan he says would reduce oil imports "and get us on a path to be virtually petroleum-free within a generation." "Vertically integrated companies like Exxon Mobil own every step of the production process - from extraction to refining to sale at the pump, enabling them to foreclose competition," says an outline of Edward's energy plan provided to his campaign. Edwards' call for a major shift away from oil use would include, according to the document: - An increase of federal auto fuel economy requirements to 45 miles per gallon from the current 27.5 mpg by 2016. - Expansion of the use of biofuels such as ethanol, including a requirement for oil companies to make available E-85 fuel (which has 85 percent ethanol) at a quarter of their stations. Edwards wants all new cars to be able to use E-85 by 2010. - Mandatory restrictions on emissions of carbon dioxide with an aim to cut CO2 and other greenhouse gases by 80 percent by mid-century. - Creation of a $13 billion energy fund from the sale of greenhouse gas permits and ending some tax breaks for the oil industry. The money would be used to support biofuels and conservation technologies. Many of Edwards' proposals - from cutting greenhouse gas emissions to investigating oil industry consolidation - have been the subject of numerous hearings in Congress this years, as has calls by Democrats to make automobiles more fuel efficient. Rival Democratic presidential candidates, including Sens. Hillary Clinton and Barack Obama, also have called for expanded use of ethanol and other measures to reduce the country's reliance on oil. But Edwards' message may resonate especially in California, the nation's most delegate-rich state, which has perennially high gasoline prices. On Wednesday, the average regular-grade gasoline in California was $3.41 per gallon, according to the AAA Daily Fuel Gauge Report. The national average was $3.20 per gallon, compared to $2.85 a year ago. But Tupper Hull, spokesman for the Sacramento-based Western States Petroleum Association, said the prices reflected market rates, and an antitrust investigation would be a waste of time. He said the industry has been the subject of more than 20 state and federal investigations over the past two decades.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BUSH_IRAQ?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Bush Sees South Korea Model for Iraq AP White House Correspondent Chaotic Scene in Baghdad on Memorial Day Searching With Missing Soldiers' Platoon A War Widow's Story The Toll: Coalition Casualties Since March 2003 How MySpace is Changing the Face of War Al-Sadr's Followers Becoming Less Unified end interactive icon section --> Latest photos from Iraq Cease-Fire Eyed to Stop Violence in Iraq Bush Calls for Global Emissions Goals Iraq Suicide Blast Leaves Up to 25 Dead Turkish General: Ready for PKK Strike Bush Sees South Korea Model for Iraq Executive Summary: DOD Inspector General on Pre-Iraq War Intelligence Activities(2/9/2007) Unclassified National Intelligence Estimate Summary on Iraq (2/2/2007) Inspector General Report on Iraq Reconstruction (1/31/2007) Latest White House Headlines Bush Calls for Global Emissions Goals Bush Sees South Korea Model for Iraq Bush Raises $675,000 for the NJ GOP Bush, Putin Plan July Meeting in Maine Bush Taps Zoellick to Lead World Bank Bush envisions a long-term U.S. troop presence in Iraq similar to the one in South Korea where American forces have helped keep an uneasy peace for more than 50 years, the White House said Wednesday. The comparison was offered as the Pentagon announced the completion of the troop buildup ordered by Bush in January. The last of about 21,500 combat troops to arrive were an Army brigade in Baghdad and a Marine unit heading into the Anbar province in western Iraq. Brig. Gen. Perry Wiggins, deputy director of operations for the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said there are now 20 combat brigades in Iraq, up from 15 when the buildup began. A brigade is roughly 3,500 troops. Overall, the Pentagon said there are 150,000 U.S. troops in Iraq. That number may still climb as more support troops move in. The administration warns that the buildup will result in more U.S. casualties as more American soldiers come into contact with enemy forces. May already is the third bloodiest month since the war began in March 2003. As of late Tuesday, there were 116 U.S. deaths in Iraq so far in May - trailing only the 137 in November 2004 and the 135 in April 2004. Overall, more than 3,460 U.S. service members have died. Presidential spokesman Tony Snow said Bush has cited the long-term Korea analogy in looking at the U.S. role in Iraq, where American forces are in the fifth year of an unpopular war. Bush's goal is for Iraqi forces to take over the chief security responsibilities, relieving U.S. forces of frontline combat duty, Snow said. "I think the point he's trying to make is that the situation in Iraq, and indeed, the larger war on terror, are things that are going to take a long time," Snow said. "But it is not always going to require an up-front combat presence." Instead, he said, U.S. troops would provide "the so-called over-the-horizon support that is necessary from time to time to come to the assistance of the Iraqis. But you do not want the United States forever in the front." The comparison with South Korea paints a picture of a lengthy U.S. commitment at a time when Americans have grown weary of the Iraq war and want U.S. troops to start coming home. Bush vetoed legislation that would set timetables for U.S. troop withdrawals, and forced Congress to approve a new bill stripped of troop pullout language. Asked if U.S. forces would be permanently stationed in Iraq, Snow said, "No, not necessarily." He said that the prospect of permanent U.S. bases in Iraq were "not necessarily the case, either." Later, Snow said it was impossible to say if U.S. troops would remain in Iraq for some 50 years, as they have in South Korea. "I don't know," he said. "It is an unanswerable question. But I'm not making that suggestion. ... The war on terror is a long war." South Korea is just one example of U.S. troops stationed more than a half-century after war. Germany and Japan are two other examples. American forces are deployed in roughly 130 countries around the world, performing a variety of duties from combat to peacekeeping to training foreign militaries, according to GlobalSecurity.org, a defense-oriented think tank. In South Korea, about 29,500 U.S. troops are stationed as a deterrent against the communist North, but that number is to decline to 24,500 by 2008 as part of the Pentagon's worldwide realignment of its forces. The two Koreas remain technically at war since the 1950-53 Korean War ended in a cease-fire, not a peace treaty. Adm. William Fallon, the top U.S. commander in the Middle East, seemed a surprising choice when he got the job earlier this year, yet his experience as U.S. commander in the Pacific overseeing the Korean peninsula would serve him well if the U.S. military adopts a Korea model in Iraq. AP writer Lolita C. Baldor contributed to this report from the Pentagon.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/P/POLITICAL_POLARIZATION?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AM EDT Iraq, Immigration Polarize 2008 Field and Democratic presidential candidates are abandoning the middle ground for positions on Iraq and immigration that cater to their parties' fringes - the latest example of polarization trumping moderation in Washington. Democrats are lurching to the left on Iraq. Republicans are moving right on immigration. Neither shift is a surprise; the two-party system encourages presidential candidates to appeal to each side's most fervent voters during the nomination fights. But two things make this cycle special: - The early start to the 2008 campaign means that White House hopefuls will be listening longer than usual to their parties' "base" voters before having to worry about what the rest of the electorate thinks. - National political leaders are more polarized than they've been in decades. "It surely doesn't bode well for reconciliation or trying to forge a consensus on these two very important topics," said David L. Epstein, an expert on political polarization at Columbia University. "The worry is that things are just going to become more polarized as times goes on and it's going to be harder and harder for whoever wins to govern." On Iraq, four of the leading Democratic candidates cast Senate votes in 2002 to give President Bush the authority to wage war. At the time, Bush's approval ratings were high and Democratic consultants warned their clients against looking weak in the war on terror by standing up to the White House. As the U.S. casualty totals in Iraq climbed, the liberal wing of the party galvanized anti-war sentiment via the Internet and applied pressure on Democratic leaders to defy Bush. To differing degrees, Democratic presidential candidates distanced themselves from their votes and the war - most notably the front-runner, Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton. In 2002, the New York senator was one of the more hawkish Democrats in Congress. She not only warned that Saddam Hussein was rebuilding his weapons of mass destruction program, but also accused the Iraqi leader of giving "aid, comfort and sanctuary to terrorists, including al-Qaida members, though there is apparently no evidence of his involvement in the terrible events of Sept. 11, 2001." Like the White House, she was wrong about Saddam's weapons and ties to al-Qaida. Even as Clinton started to question the president's integrity and competence regarding the war, she often echoed his rhetoric. "Failure is not an option," she said in December 2003 about Iraq and Afghanistan. "We have no option but to stay involved and committed." Her position became politically untenable when freshman Sen. Barack Obama of Illinois entered the race, burnishing his record of opposing the war from the start. Under pressure, Clinton and Obama tacked to the left in recent weeks - first opposing deadlines for U.S. troop withdrawal, then reversing course last week to vote against funding the war. On immigration, the GOP's top tier is filled with candidates who previously supported immigrant rights in general or, specifically, backed giving illegal immigrants a route to citizenship: Sen. John McCain of Arizona, former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani, former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney and former Sen. Fred Thompson. Only McCain has stood by his views. The others fell in line behind the anti-immigration GOP base to oppose a compromise bill forged by the White House and Democratic lawmakers. Thompson went so far as to say the United States is "beset by people who are suicidal maniacs and want to kill countless innocent men, women and children around the world" - an inflammatory charge that he didn't even try to substantiate. The positioning on Iraq and immigration is part of a broader trend toward polarization in Washington, which some experts believe is more pronounced than any time since the late 1800s. The factors contributing to polarization today are similar to those from a century or so ago. They include: - New technologies that democratize communications (the telegraph then, and the Internet now). - Clusters of emotional issues that tend to divide people (trust-busting, civil rights and immigration then; abortion, gay rights and immigration now). - More sophisticated political strategies (peer-to-peer persuasion on the precinct level then; microtargeting and high-tech redistricting now). "The bases are much more clearly defined from one another than they've been since maybe the turn of the last century," said Marc J. Hetherington, an associate professor of political science at Vanderbilt University who is writing a book on polarization called "Divided We Stand." Still, the nation's political leaders are generally more divided than the people they represent - on Iraq, immigration and other issues. "It makes it very difficult to govern," Hetherington said. "It makes it really hard to get anything done." EDITOR'S NOTE - Ron Fournier has covered politics for nearly 20 years.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CLINTON_IRAQ?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT 11:07 PM EDT Sen. Clinton Defends Private Jet Travel Senator Hillary Clinton says accepting such trips is how every senator operates. Text of Clinton campaign memo Sen. Clinton Defends Private Jet Travel Clinton Defends Jet Travel LA Mayor to Back Clinton Clinton Outlines Broad Economic Vision Clinton Asks YouTube Users for Song Help Chaotic Scene in Baghdad on Memorial Day Searching With Missing Soldiers' Platoon A War Widow's Story The Toll: Coalition Casualties Since March 2003 How MySpace is Changing the Face of War Al-Sadr's Followers Becoming Less Unified end interactive icon section --> Latest photos from Iraq Cease-Fire Eyed to Stop Violence in Iraq Bush Calls for Global Emissions Goals Iraq Suicide Blast Leaves Up to 25 Dead Turkish General: Ready for PKK Strike Bush Sees South Korea Model for Iraq Executive Summary: DOD Inspector General on Pre-Iraq War Intelligence Activities(2/9/2007) Unclassified National Intelligence Estimate Summary on Iraq (2/2/2007) Inspector General Report on Iraq Reconstruction (1/31/2007) Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand LAS VEGAS (AP) -- Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton said Wednesday that she followed all Senate rules when she accepted rides on a private jet from a longtime benefactor. "Whatever I've done, I complied with Senate rules at the time. That's the way every senator operates," the Democratic presidential contender said in an interview with a campaign stop in Las Vegas. Clinton's travel, along with and consulting fees paid to her husband, the former president, have come to light recently in a lawsuit against Vinod Gupta, a Clinton contributor and chief executive of the data company, InfoUSA Inc. The lawsuit by company shareholders accuses Gupta of excessively spending millions of dollars, including $900,000 worth of travel on the Clintons. Sen. Clinton, who complained about corporate America's largesse and skyrocketing executive pay during campaign events Wednesday, said she did not believe her message was undermined by her acceptance of the private flights. In line with Senate rules then in effect, Clinton's campaign has said she reimbursed Gupta at the cost of a first-class flight, typically a significant discount off the expense of a private jet. "Those were the rules. You'll have to ask somebody else whether that's good policy," she said. The Senate earlier this year voted to change the rules to require senators, their staff and candidates for federal office to pay the charter rate for flights on corporate jets. All the presidential candidates serving in the Senate, including Clinton, voted for the change. Clinton struck several populist notes Wednesday in a speech at a union hall and at a town hall appearance at a North Las Vegas high school with large number of minority and low-income students. The senator told members of the Culinary Workers Union, a group that represents casino and hotel workers, that it should be made easier for unions to organize and that private equity firms should honor union contracts after buyouts. Both issues are important to the union, whose endorsement is considered key to winning Nevada's Jan. 19 caucus. The senator made light of her own personal wealth. "I know a lot of rich people. My husband and I never had any money ... now all (of a) ... sudden we're rich," Clinton said. "I have nothing against rich people. ... but what made America great is the American middle class." Clinton won her loudest applause with her promise to end the war in Iraq. In the AP interview, she defended her vote against an Iraq war funding bill, saying she believes that President Bush will begin withdrawing troops from Iraq soon and she doesn't want to back his strategy any longer. Clinton said she came to the conclusion while watching the president's Rose Garden news conference last week in which he referred to the bipartisan Iraq Study Group report. "He talked about it favorably for the first time I've ever heard him talk about it," Clinton said. "That was to me a big signal that starting in the fall and toward the end of the year we're going to start seeing troops withdrawn from Iraq. "My argument is, why wait?" Among other things, the Iraq Study Group warned against sending more troops for long stints in the war zone and initially called for withdrawal by early 2008. Clinton and her chief rival for the Democratic presidential nomination, Illinois Sen. Barack Obama, voted against the funding bill last week in the face of strong pressure from liberal groups who wanted Democrats to use the bill to force a change of course. Clinton earlier supported a bill calling for a withdrawal timeline, which was vetoed by the president. Clinton initially opposed cutting off funding for the troops, but said Wednesday that she believed last week's vote was cast in support of soldiers abroad. "The best thing I can do to continue my very vigorous support of the troops is to begin to bring them home," she said. Clinton declined to comment on two unreleased biographies that, according to press accounts, describe the former first lady's road to her candidacy in unflattering terms. She said she wasn't familiar with the books. Clinton acknowledged an assertion reportedly contained in one of the books: that she did not read a National Intelligence Estimate before voting to authorize the president to go to war in Iraq. "I don't believe that I did or that vast majority of my colleagues did because we were briefed repeatedly about everything that was in it," she said. Later Wednesday in Los Angeles, Clinton toured a child-care center with Mayor Antonio Villaraigosa, who formally endorsed her campaign at a news conference. She was expected to raise $1 million at two Los Angeles-area fundraisers Wednesday night.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CIVIL_UNIONS?SITE=CAVEN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News : to the paper May 31, 12:15 PM EDT N.H. governor signs civil unions law Australian gay bar can bar heterosexuals Russian police detain gay activists Gays flock to Fla. Panhandle for holiday Romney: I'm not intolerant of gays Hearing sought over linguists' discharge N.H. (AP) -- Gay couples in New Hampshire can start applying for many of the rights and responsibilities of marriage as early as January under a law Gov. John Lynch signed Thursday establishing civil unions. "We in New Hampshire have had a long and proud tradition taking the lead in opposing discrimination," Lynch said. "Today that tradition continues." Couples who enter civil unions will have the same rights, responsibilities and obligations as married couples. Same-sex unions from other states also would be recognized if they were legal in the state where they were performed. Legislators who gathered for the bill signing packed the governor's chambers and overflowed into an adjoining sitting room. They snapped photos and burst into applause as he signed it. "I've listened and I've heard all the arguments," said Lynch, a Democrat. "I do not believe that this bill threatens marriage. I believe that this is a matter of conscience and fairness." Episcopal Bishop V. Gene Robinson was among those attending. Although his consecration in 2003 as the first openly gay bishop in the Episcopal Church divided the worldwide Anglican Communion to which it belongs, Robinson and his longtime partner plan to take advantage of civil unions. "This is not a radical departure," Robinson said of the bill. "This is a real confirmation of what New Hampshire has always been about: the freedom of its own citizens and fairness for everyone." Robinson said he will not direct Episcopal priests in the state to bless same-sex unions, letting priests decide that individually. Such blessings have been another divisive issue for Episcopalians and the Anglican union. "That authority belongs to them and I would not in any way ask them not to do that. ... Just like in marriages, every priest will have the option to bless or not to bless," Robinson said. Massachusetts alone among the U.S. states allows gay marriage. Connecticut, Vermont, New Jersey, Maine, California and Washington allow either civil unions or domestic partnerships, and Oregon will join the list with New Hampshire in January. Hawaii extends certain spousal rights to same-sex couples and cohabiting heterosexual pairs. (This version CORRECTS name to Anglican Communion.) 2007
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CALIFORNIA_2008_CANDIDATES?SITE=CAVEN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News : to the paper May 31, 12:44 AM EDT Presidential hopefuls campaign in Calif. AP Photo/Marcio Jose Sanchez Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand BURLINGAME, Calif. (AP) -- Republican presidential candidate Rudy Giuliani on Wednesday declared that California's early primary has made the state more than a political ATM - just as he accepted a check from a supporter and then headed to two fundraisers. California's Feb. 5 presidential primary seemed to be having a modest effect, with several major candidates blending their fundraising chores with campaign stops to greet potential voters. Mostly, however, the focus was on fundraising. Democrats John Edwards and Hillary Rodham Clinton also trolled the nation's most delegate-rich state for cash and votes Wednesday. Between them, the three candidates held six California money events. Edwards, during an appearance between the four fundraisers he is holding over two days, decried the influence of money on politics and called for public financing of campaigns. "I'm not holier-than-thou about this. I've raised millions of dollars in 2004 and now to run for president," he added. "But that doesn't mean I think the system is good, because I don't." Giuliani stepped off a plane at San Francisco International Airport and promptly went to the Broadway Grill a few minutes away to chat with customers. His campaign ensured the lunchtime visit was stacked with supporters, sending out an e-mail Wednesday morning urging them to stop by the cafe en route to the fundraiser. Those crowded into the restaurant appeared to be a mix of regulars in T-shirts and committed supporters clad in suits and ties and bound for the fundraiser, which cost $250 and up. George Yerby handed the candidate a check for $200 on the spot. Giuliani hastily passed it to an aide. "He's going to be the next president," Yerby, 67, who lives in the wealthy Bay area enclave of Hillsborough, said afterward. "I hope." Giuliani closed his fundraisers here and in Beverly Hills to the public and news media. The restaurant stop, where he sipped orange juice and coffee, was open. He acknowledged to reporters outside the grill that raising money "has always been a big focus in California, like it was in New York." "One of the complaints that New Yorkers have had, and that Californians have had, is 'They come here, they take our money, but they don't campaign here.'," he said. "So now, they're going to get both - they're going to get us coming here and trying to get your money, but also coming here and campaigning." California is one of 15 states to move its primary to Feb. 5, and others are considering it. Its primary for state candidates will remain in June 2008. Giuliani promised to return regularly if he captures the GOP presidential nomination. "I think I'm the one Republican candidate who has a legitimate chance of winning California. That's based on the polls," he said. A Field Poll of California voters in March suggested otherwise. It showed GOP rival Sen. John McCain running stronger against Edwards and Clinton in hypothetical head-to-head matchups. McCain and Giuliani trailed Democratic candidate Barack Obama by identical margins, and also were behind Clinton and Edwards. Edwards headlined a fundraiser in San Francisco on Wednesday, headed to a second one Wednesday evening in the Bay area suburb of Atherton and planned two more Thursday. During an appearance at the headquarters of search-engine leader Google, Edwards said the current system of paying for campaigns is "dysfunctional." "The way we finance political campaigns in this country, it couldn't be more unhealthy," Edwards told about 1,000 Google employees. He called for taxpayer-financed campaigns - the only way, he said, to "literally pull the life out of these big groups - people that have a huge presence in Washington, lobbying groups." The former senator from North Carolina was the fourth presidential candidate to submit to questioning by executives and staffers of Google. Clinton, meanwhile, held two fundraisers in the Los Angeles area, one hosted by director Steven Spielberg. 2007
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/H/HISPANICS_2008?SITE=CAVEN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News : to the paper May 31, 5:28 AM EDT Endorsement spotlights Hispanic vote By MICHAEL R. BLOOD Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand LOS ANGELES (AP) -- Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton's political courtship of Mayor Antonio Villaraigosa landed her an early, influential endorsement this week that highlights the intense competition among presidential candidates for support within the growing Hispanic population. Candidates in both major parties are reaching out to Hispanic voters with an intensity that speaks to the importance of the nation's largest and fastest-growing minority group in the 2008 campaign. Republican Mitt Romney has hired a Spanish-language media adviser in Florida. Democrat Bill Richardson, whose mother is Mexican, has made overt appeals to Hispanic voters, including announcing his candidacy in English and Spanish. Sen. Barack Obama and John Edwards are among the candidates devoting parts of their Web sites to Spanish speakers. And next week, Sen. John McCain will travel to Miami to deliver a speech on immigration, a site chosen in part because of the city's large Hispanic population. "As we've seen in the last few elections, the Hispanic vote has become a critical ... part of the Republican coalition," said Romney aide Alex Burgos. With large Hispanic populations in early voting states like Florida, California and New York, "it takes on even more importance," he said. Hispanics tend to lean Democratic in national elections, but President Bush showed in 2004 that Republicans have much at stake. Bush captured about 40 percent of the Hispanic vote that year, the most ever for a GOP presidential candidate. His Democratic rival, John Kerry, won 53 percent, down from the 62 percent former Vice President Al Gore garnered in 2000. Villaraigosa, a potential gubernatorial candidate in 2010, is one of the nation's most recognized Hispanic politicians. He's expected to serve as a strong advocate for Clinton among Hispanics, particularly in vote-rich Southern California. California's Hispanic population is nearing 36 percent - more than double the U.S. average. However, Hispanics historically vote in numbers well below their share of the population, in part because many are either too young to vote, unregistered or foreign citizens. But as the Hispanic population increases in the state, so has voting participation. In 1992, Hispanics accounted for about 8 percent of Californians going to the polls; in 2006, the figure hit 14 percent, according to figures compiled by the Public Policy Institute of California. Their impact is strongest on the Democratic side of the ticket - one of every five party voters in the state is Hispanic. In the national midterm election in 2006, Democrats recaptured a large part of the Hispanic vote - nearly seven in 10 Hispanic voters supported Democratic congressional candidates, exit polls found. But Republicans in several key states also did well, suggesting Latinos could be important swing voters in 2008. Hispanics could play important roles in potential battleground states like Nevada, Colorado and Arizona, which have large Latino populations. In California "the increasing proportion of Latino adults, greater rates of citizenship and increasing social mobility are all leading to higher proportions of Latinos turning out at the polls," said Public Policy Institute pollster Mark Baldassare. For "Democratic candidates to win, they will need to do well among Latino voters," he added. Not surprisingly, Villaraigosa's endorsement Wednesday was eagerly sought by all the leading Democratic candidates. Clinton landed the nod after a series of phone calls and meetings, which included a New York City dinner between the mayor and former President Bill Clinton. The senator earlier hired a Villaraigosa political adviser to run her California campaign and named state Assembly Speaker Fabian Nunez, a close friend of the mayor and another prominent Hispanic politician, a national co-chair of her campaign. She also appointed Villaraigosa a national co-chair. 2007
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CLINTON_IRAQ?SITE=CAVEN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News : to the paper May 30, 11:07 PM EDT Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Senator Hillary Clinton says accepting such trips is how every senator operates. Text of Clinton campaign memo Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Clinton defends jet travel LA mayor to back Clinton Clinton outlines broad economic vision Clinton asks YouTube users for song help Chaotic Scene in Baghdad on Memorial Day Searching With Missing Soldiers' Platoon A War Widow's Story The Toll: Coalition Casualties Since March 2003 How MySpace is Changing the Face of War Al-Sadr's Followers Becoming Less Unified end interactive icon section --> Latest photos from Iraq Bush calls for global emissions goals Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq Turkish general: Ready for PKK strike Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Executive Summary: DOD Inspector General on Pre-Iraq War Intelligence Activities(2/9/2007) Unclassified National Intelligence Estimate Summary on Iraq (2/2/2007) Inspector General Report on Iraq Reconstruction (1/31/2007) Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand LAS VEGAS (AP) -- Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton said Wednesday that she followed all Senate rules when she accepted rides on a private jet from a longtime benefactor. "Whatever I've done, I complied with Senate rules at the time. That's the way every senator operates," the Democratic presidential contender said in an interview with a campaign stop in Las Vegas. Clinton's travel, along with and consulting fees paid to her husband, the former president, have come to light recently in a lawsuit against Vinod Gupta, a Clinton contributor and chief executive of the data company, InfoUSA Inc. The lawsuit by company shareholders accuses Gupta of excessively spending millions of dollars, including $900,000 worth of travel on the Clintons. Sen. Clinton, who complained about corporate America's largesse and skyrocketing executive pay during campaign events Wednesday, said she did not believe her message was undermined by her acceptance of the private flights. In line with Senate rules then in effect, Clinton's campaign has said she reimbursed Gupta at the cost of a first-class flight, typically a significant discount off the expense of a private jet. "Those were the rules. You'll have to ask somebody else whether that's good policy," she said. The Senate earlier this year voted to change the rules to require senators, their staff and candidates for federal office to pay the charter rate for flights on corporate jets. All the presidential candidates serving in the Senate, including Clinton, voted for the change. Clinton struck several populist notes Wednesday in a speech at a union hall and at a town hall appearance at a North Las Vegas high school with large number of minority and low-income students. The senator told members of the Culinary Workers Union, a group that represents casino and hotel workers, that it should be made easier for unions to organize and that private equity firms should honor union contracts after buyouts. Both issues are important to the union, whose endorsement is considered key to winning Nevada's Jan. 19 caucus. The senator made light of her own personal wealth. "I know a lot of rich people. My husband and I never had any money ... now all (of a) ... sudden we're rich," Clinton said. "I have nothing against rich people. ... but what made America great is the American middle class." Clinton won her loudest applause with her promise to end the war in Iraq. In the AP interview, she defended her vote against an Iraq war funding bill, saying she believes that President Bush will begin withdrawing troops from Iraq soon and she doesn't want to back his strategy any longer. Clinton said she came to the conclusion while watching the president's Rose Garden news conference last week in which he referred to the bipartisan Iraq Study Group report. "He talked about it favorably for the first time I've ever heard him talk about it," Clinton said. "That was to me a big signal that starting in the fall and toward the end of the year we're going to start seeing troops withdrawn from Iraq. "My argument is, why wait?" Among other things, the Iraq Study Group warned against sending more troops for long stints in the war zone and initially called for withdrawal by early 2008. Clinton and her chief rival for the Democratic presidential nomination, Illinois Sen. Barack Obama, voted against the funding bill last week in the face of strong pressure from liberal groups who wanted Democrats to use the bill to force a change of course. Clinton earlier supported a bill calling for a withdrawal timeline, which was vetoed by the president. Clinton initially opposed cutting off funding for the troops, but said Wednesday that she believed last week's vote was cast in support of soldiers abroad. "The best thing I can do to continue my very vigorous support of the troops is to begin to bring them home," she said. Clinton declined to comment on two unreleased biographies that, according to press accounts, describe the former first lady's road to her candidacy in unflattering terms. She said she wasn't familiar with the books. Clinton acknowledged an assertion reportedly contained in one of the books: that she did not read a National Intelligence Estimate before voting to authorize the president to go to war in Iraq. "I don't believe that I did or that vast majority of my colleagues did because we were briefed repeatedly about everything that was in it," she said. Later Wednesday in Los Angeles, Clinton toured a child-care center with Mayor Antonio Villaraigosa, who formally endorsed her campaign at a news conference. She was expected to raise $1 million at two Los Angeles-area fundraisers Wednesday night. 2007
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/P/POLITICAL_POLARIZATION?SITE=CAVEN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News : to the paper May 31, 3:30 AM EDT Iraq, immigration polarize 2008 field (AP) -- Republican and Democratic presidential candidates are abandoning the middle ground for positions on Iraq and immigration that cater to their parties' fringes - the latest example of polarization trumping moderation in Washington. Democrats are lurching to the left on Iraq. Republicans are moving right on immigration. Neither shift is a surprise; the two-party system encourages presidential candidates to appeal to each side's most fervent voters during the nomination fights. But two things make this cycle special: - The early start to the 2008 campaign means that White House hopefuls will be listening longer than usual to their parties' "base" voters before having to worry about what the rest of the electorate thinks. - National political leaders are more polarized than they've been in decades. "It surely doesn't bode well for reconciliation or trying to forge a consensus on these two very important topics," said David L. Epstein, an expert on political polarization at Columbia University. "The worry is that things are just going to become more polarized as times goes on and it's going to be harder and harder for whoever wins to govern." On Iraq, four of the leading Democratic candidates cast Senate votes in 2002 to give President Bush the authority to wage war. At the time, Bush's approval ratings were high and Democratic consultants warned their clients against looking weak in the war on terror by standing up to the White House. As the U.S. casualty totals in Iraq climbed, the liberal wing of the party galvanized anti-war sentiment via the Internet and applied pressure on Democratic leaders to defy Bush. To differing degrees, Democratic presidential candidates distanced themselves from their votes and the war - most notably the front-runner, Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton. In 2002, the New York senator was one of the more hawkish Democrats in Congress. She not only warned that Saddam Hussein was rebuilding his weapons of mass destruction program, but also accused the Iraqi leader of giving "aid, comfort and sanctuary to terrorists, including al-Qaida members, though there is apparently no evidence of his involvement in the terrible events of Sept. 11, 2001." Like the White House, she was wrong about Saddam's weapons and ties to al-Qaida. Even as Clinton started to question the president's integrity and competence regarding the war, she often echoed his rhetoric. "Failure is not an option," she said in December 2003 about Iraq and Afghanistan. "We have no option but to stay involved and committed." Her position became politically untenable when freshman Sen. Barack Obama of Illinois entered the race, burnishing his record of opposing the war from the start. Under pressure, Clinton and Obama tacked to the left in recent weeks - first opposing deadlines for U.S. troop withdrawal, then reversing course last week to vote against funding the war. On immigration, the GOP's top tier is filled with candidates who previously supported immigrant rights in general or, specifically, backed giving illegal immigrants a route to citizenship: Sen. John McCain of Arizona, former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani, former Massachusetts Gov. Mitt Romney and former Sen. Fred Thompson. Only McCain has stood by his views. The others fell in line behind the anti-immigration GOP base to oppose a compromise bill forged by the White House and Democratic lawmakers. Thompson went so far as to say the United States is "beset by people who are suicidal maniacs and want to kill countless innocent men, women and children around the world" - an inflammatory charge that he didn't even try to substantiate. The positioning on Iraq and immigration is part of a broader trend toward polarization in Washington, which some experts believe is more pronounced than any time since the late 1800s. The factors contributing to polarization today are similar to those from a century or so ago. They include: - New technologies that democratize communications (the telegraph then, and the Internet now). - Clusters of emotional issues that tend to divide people (trust-busting, civil rights and immigration then; abortion, gay rights and immigration now). - More sophisticated political strategies (peer-to-peer persuasion on the precinct level then; microtargeting and high-tech redistricting now). "The bases are much more clearly defined from one another than they've been since maybe the turn of the last century," said Marc J. Hetherington, an associate professor of political science at Vanderbilt University who is writing a book on polarization called "Divided We Stand." Still, the nation's political leaders are generally more divided than the people they represent - on Iraq, immigration and other issues. "It makes it very difficult to govern," Hetherington said. "It makes it really hard to get anything done." EDITOR'S NOTE - Ron Fournier has covered politics for nearly 20 years. 2007
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/F/FRED_THOMPSON?SITE=CAVEN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News : to the paper May 30, 11:47 PM EDT Thompson moves toward White House bid Actor Thompson Inches Toward White House Bid (AP) -- Fred Thompson, the former Tennessee senator and "Law & Order" actor, is taking significant steps toward an expected summer entry into the crowded but extraordinarily unsettled Republican presidential race. His likely candidacy could give restless conservatives somewhere to turn. A crucial bloc of the GOP, those voters have not fully embraced the leading contenders, giving Thompson what his backers argue is an opening for a "true conservative" who can triumph in November 2008. The 64-year-old Southerner would bring a right-leaning Senate voting record with a few digressions from GOP orthd odoxy and a dash of Hollywood star power given his many movie roles and TV stint as the gruff district attorney on NBC's popular crime drama. On Wednesday, Thompson asked to be released from his role of playing a prosecutor on the TV series "Law & Order." The show's executive producer, Dick Wolf, said Thompson told him he "has not made a firm decision about his political future" but that he was concerned about "the creative and scheduling constraints of the upcoming season." A Thompson bid also could make the contest to succeed President Bush even more topsy turvy; all three top-tier candidates - Rudy Giuliani, John McCain and Mitt Romney - could lose some measure of support and the seven underdogs could become even more irrelevant. Thompson will make his first formal campaign move in the coming days, establishing an official organization to weigh a White House bid while launching a major fundraising drive on Monday, according to several Republicans with knowledge of his plans. Speaking on condition of anonymity because the timeline is not public, these officials said Thompson may visit early primary states in late June and could officially enter the race as early as the first week in July. "Senator Thompson is still seriously considering getting into the presidential contest and he is doing everything he has to do to make that final decision," said Mark Corallo, a Thompson spokesman. "Stay tuned." On Thompson's schedule in the coming weeks: a speech to Virginia Republicans in Richmond on Saturday and an appearance with Jay Leno on "The Tonight Show" on June 12. One official said an overseas trip also may be in the works. For months, Thompson has openly flirted with a candidacy as a Tennessee-based effort sought to draft him into the race. He made several high-profile moves that pointed to a bid, not the least of which was disclosing that he is in remission after being diagnosed with non-Hodgkins lymphoma, a form of cancer. His popularity in national polls spiked to double digits early in the year, but while he still fares well in surveys, his numbers have fallen following what some Republicans considered a subpar speech in early May in California. That's prompted some rumblings in GOP circles that Thompson may have missed his opportunity to make a splash in the race. Undaunted, Thompson has been casting himself as a straight-talking conservative in the mold of former President Reagan in speeches and on the Internet. "He's not Ronald Reagan, but he's Reaganesque," said Ted Malloch of Palm Beach, Fla., the chief executive of a consulting firm who is supporting Thompson. "Fred is unique in the sense that all the boxes have been checked." During his 1994-2002 Senate tenure, he was considered a reliably conservative vote. He worked to limit the role of the federal government and backed a ban on a late-term abortion procedure. He voted in favor of Bush's tax cuts, oil drilling in the Arctic National Wildlife Refuge, eliminating money for the National Endowment for the Arts and a constitutional amendment to ban flag desecration. And, he voted against requiring criminal background checks for purchases at gun shows. But he sometimes took paths that didn't necessarily sit well with conservatives, including advocating for campaign finance reform. While he voted to oust President Clinton from office, he also was one of 10 Republican senators who voted against one of the two impeachment charges. Social issues, important to the party's right, also typically weren't at the top of his agenda. He was known less as a legislator and more as an investigator, leading the committee that examined former President Clinton's fundraising in 1996. Yet, he established a reputation as a less-than-hard worker. The Democratic National Committee issued a research document Wednesday detailing Thompson's major legislative accomplishments. Save for the title and a DNC disclaimer, it was blank. Thompson was one of the few senators who backed underdog McCain in 2000 over George W. Bush, the establishment candidate. This time around, Thompson would be opposing McCain - and could hurt his friend's own shot at the White House. The two have similar Senate records but Thompson could be seen as a fresher face to McCain, who is well-known to GOP voters. Romney, who is trying to position himself to the right of the major candidates, also could see his support fall among conservatives concerned about his shifts on issues. Campaigning in Iowa, Romney said he welcomed a Thompson entry. "I think he'll make the race more interesting. He's got good ideas and after all, he does put bad people in jail every week on 'Law & Order,'" he said. Giuliani could be hindered as well if Thompson grabs the attention of Republicans uneasy with the former New York City mayor's support for gay and abortion rights. Campaigning in California, Giuliani said he would welcome Thompson, but argued that he was the stronger candidate based on his record of cutting taxes and combatting terrorism as well as his ability to win a general election. Ticking off states that went Democratic in 2004, such as California and New York, Giuliani said, "Those are all states Republicans gave away in the past and the Democrats took for granted. ... It doesn't mean I'll win all of them, but if I win my fair share of them, then I'll get elected." Over the next few days, Thompson plans to form a "testing the waters" committee called "Friends of Fred Thompson," which will allow him to begin raising money, hire staff and gauge support without officially committing to a White House bid. He could significantly dampen the fundraising ability of his potential GOP rivals during the homestretch of the second quarter financial reporting period. "It's going to cause everybody to have second thoughts about writing a check," said Scott Reed, a Republican strategist who is unaligned in the race. Thompson spoke on a conference call Wednesday to several dozen people who officials called "First Day Founders" and said committed to raising money for him. Participants said they were asked to raise $46,000 apiece, the $2,300 maximum from 10 couples or 20 people. Officials cautioned that Thompson has made no final decision. 2007
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BUSH?SITE=CAVEN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News : to the paper May 31, 12:52 PM EDT Bush calls for global emissions goals AP White House Correspondent AP Photo/J. Scott Applewhite Latest White House Headlines Bush calls for global emissions goals Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Bush raises $675,000 for the NJ GOP Bush, Putin plan July meeting in Maine Bush taps Zoellick to lead World Bank (AP) -- President Bush, seeking to blunt international criticism of the U.S. record on climate change, on Thursday urged 15 major nations to agree by the end of next year on a global target for reducing greenhouse gases. Bush called for the first in a series of meetings to begin this fall, bringing together countries identified as major emitters of greenhouse gases blamed for global warming. The list would include the United States, China, India and major European countries. After setting a goal, the nations would be free to develop their own strategies to meet the target. The president outlined his proposal in a speech ahead of next week's summit in Germany of leading industrialized nations, where global warming is to be a major topic and Bush will be on the spot. The United States has refused to ratify the landmark 1997 Kyoto Protocol requiring industrialized countries to reduce greenhouse gases to 1990 levels by 2012. Developing countries, including China and India, were exempted from that first round of cuts. Bush rejected the Kyoto approach, as well as the latest German proposal for what happens after 2012. "The United States takes this issue seriously," Bush said. "The new initiative I'm outlining today will contribute to the important dialogue that will take place in Germany next week." Environmental groups were quick to criticize Bush's plan. Friends of the Earth president Brent Blackwelder called the proposal "a complete charade. It is an attempt to make the Bush administration look like it takes global warming seriously without actually doing anything to curb emissions." National Environmental Trust president Philip Clapp said, "This is a transparent effort to divert attention from the president's refusal to accept any emissions reductions proposals at next week's G-8 summit. After sitting out talks on global warming for years, the Bush administration doesn't have very much credibility with other governments on the issue. " And, Daniel J. Weiss, climate strategy director for the liberal Center for American Progress, said the Bush administration has a "do-nothing" policy on global warming despite U.S. allies' best efforts to spur U.S. reductions. British Prime Minister Tony Blair called Bush's plan "a big step forward." "For the first time America's saying it wants to be part of a global deal," Blair said in Johannesburg, South Africa, speaking to Sky News. "For the first time it's setting its own domestic targets. For the first time it's saying it wants a global target for the reduction of emissions, and therefore for the first time I think the opportunity for a proper global deal." Along with his call for a global emissions goal, Bush urged other nations to eliminate tariffs on clean energy technologies. Germany, which holds the European Union and Group of Eight presidencies, is proposing a target allowing global temperatures to increase no more than 2 degrees Celsius - the equivalent of 3.6 degrees Fahrenheit - before being brought back down. Practically, experts have said that means a global reduction in emissions of 50 percent below 1990 levels by 2050. Instead, Bush called for nations to hold a series of meetings, beginning this fall, to set a global emissions goal. Each nation then would have to decide on how to achieve the goal, White House officials said. "The United States will work with other nations to establish a new framework for greenhouse gas emissions for when the Kyoto Protocol expires in 2012," the president said. "So my proposal is this: By the end of next year, America and other nations will set a long-term global goal for reducing greenhouse gases. To develop this goal, the United States will convene a series of meetings of nations that produce the most greenhouse gasses, including nations with rapidly growing economies like India and China. "Each country would establish midterm management targets and programs that reflect their own mix of energy sources and future energy needs," he said. "In the course of the next 18 months, our nations will bring together industry leaders from different sectors of our economies, such as power generation, and alternative fuels and transportation." James Connaughton, chairman of the White House Council on Environmental Quality, rejected charges that the U.S. was dragging its feet in the fight against climate change. "This is actually accelerating it," he said. "If we wanted to put things off further, you'd have annual meetings at the U.N. for the next five years. If you want to accelerate it, we do a lot of groundwork in between the U.N. meetings so we can bring the work product to the U.N. meetings." The U.S. last year experienced a drop in emissions of carbon dioxide, the heat-trapping gas most blamed for global warming. The 1.3 percent decline from 2005, the first drop in 11 years, was due to a mild winter and a cool summer, along with other factors including greater industrial efficiency and increased capacity of nuclear power plants. Carbon dioxide is produced from burning fossil fuels, including natural gas and coal, which are used widely to produce electricity. While Bush announced his new proposal, the administration registered its opposition to the idea of a global carbon-trading program allowing countries to buy and sell carbon credits to meet limits on carbon dioxide levels. The White House also expressed opposition to the energy efficiency targets advocated by the EU. 2007
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BUSH_IRAQ?SITE=CAVEN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News : to the paper May 31, 1:42 AM EDT Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq AP White House Correspondent Chaotic Scene in Baghdad on Memorial Day Searching With Missing Soldiers' Platoon A War Widow's Story The Toll: Coalition Casualties Since March 2003 How MySpace is Changing the Face of War Al-Sadr's Followers Becoming Less Unified end interactive icon section --> Latest photos from Iraq Bush calls for global emissions goals Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq Turkish general: Ready for PKK strike Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Executive Summary: DOD Inspector General on Pre-Iraq War Intelligence Activities(2/9/2007) Unclassified National Intelligence Estimate Summary on Iraq (2/2/2007) Inspector General Report on Iraq Reconstruction (1/31/2007) Latest White House Headlines Bush calls for global emissions goals Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Bush raises $675,000 for the NJ GOP Bush, Putin plan July meeting in Maine Bush taps Zoellick to lead World Bank (AP) -- President Bush envisions a long-term U.S. troop presence in Iraq similar to the one in South Korea where American forces have helped keep an uneasy peace for more than 50 years, the White House said Wednesday. The comparison was offered as the Pentagon announced the completion of the troop buildup ordered by Bush in January. The last of about 21,500 combat troops to arrive were an Army brigade in Baghdad and a Marine unit heading into the Anbar province in western Iraq. Brig. Gen. Perry Wiggins, deputy director of operations for the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said there are now 20 combat brigades in Iraq, up from 15 when the buildup began. A brigade is roughly 3,500 troops. Overall, the Pentagon said there are 150,000 U.S. troops in Iraq. That number may still climb as more support troops move in. The administration warns that the buildup will result in more U.S. casualties as more American soldiers come into contact with enemy forces. May already is the third bloodiest month since the war began in March 2003. As of late Tuesday, there were 116 U.S. deaths in Iraq so far in May - trailing only the 137 in November 2004 and the 135 in April 2004. Overall, more than 3,460 U.S. service members have died. Presidential spokesman Tony Snow said Bush has cited the long-term Korea analogy in looking at the U.S. role in Iraq, where American forces are in the fifth year of an unpopular war. Bush's goal is for Iraqi forces to take over the chief security responsibilities, relieving U.S. forces of frontline combat duty, Snow said. "I think the point he's trying to make is that the situation in Iraq, and indeed, the larger war on terror, are things that are going to take a long time," Snow said. "But it is not always going to require an up-front combat presence." Instead, he said, U.S. troops would provide "the so-called over-the-horizon support that is necessary from time to time to come to the assistance of the Iraqis. But you do not want the United States forever in the front." The comparison with South Korea paints a picture of a lengthy U.S. commitment at a time when Americans have grown weary of the Iraq war and want U.S. troops to start coming home. Bush vetoed legislation that would set timetables for U.S. troop withdrawals, and forced Congress to approve a new bill stripped of troop pullout language. Asked if U.S. forces would be permanently stationed in Iraq, Snow said, "No, not necessarily." He said that the prospect of permanent U.S. bases in Iraq were "not necessarily the case, either." Later, Snow said it was impossible to say if U.S. troops would remain in Iraq for some 50 years, as they have in South Korea. "I don't know," he said. "It is an unanswerable question. But I'm not making that suggestion. ... The war on terror is a long war." South Korea is just one example of U.S. troops stationed more than a half-century after war. Germany and Japan are two other examples. American forces are deployed in roughly 130 countries around the world, performing a variety of duties from combat to peacekeeping to training foreign militaries, according to GlobalSecurity.org, a defense-oriented think tank. In South Korea, about 29,500 U.S. troops are stationed as a deterrent against the communist North, but that number is to decline to 24,500 by 2008 as part of the Pentagon's worldwide realignment of its forces. The two Koreas remain technically at war since the 1950-53 Korean War ended in a cease-fire, not a peace treaty. Adm. William Fallon, the top U.S. commander in the Middle East, seemed a surprising choice when he got the job earlier this year, yet his experience as U.S. commander in the Pacific overseeing the Korean peninsula would serve him well if the U.S. military adopts a Korea model in Iraq. AP writer Lolita C. Baldor contributed to this report from the Pentagon. 2007
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/E/EDWARDS_GAS_PRICES?SITE=CAVEN&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT AP News : to the paper May 31, 12:43 PM EDT Edwards wants probe of high gas prices Analysts: Storms could affect gas prices BP shuts 100,000 barrels of Alaska oil Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand Latest Photos of John Edwards Edwards wants probe of high gas prices Edwards defends stepped-up war opposition Edwards assails Bush, GOP rivals Edwards: 'War on terror' has hurt U.S. Edwards touts plan to end Iraq conflict This Week's Gas Prices Around the Nation Interactive: How Gas Prices Are Determined Where Do Your Gas Taxes Go? Take a State-by-State Look SAN FRANCISCO (AP) -- Democratic presidential hopeful John Edwards says a wave of mergers in the oil industry should be investigated by the Justice Department to see what impact they have had on soaring gasoline prices. During a campaign stop in Silicon Valley Thursday, Edwards planned to berate the oil industry for "anticompetitive actions" and outline an energy plan he says would reduce oil imports "and get us on a path to be virtually petroleum-free within a generation." "Vertically integrated companies like Exxon Mobil own every step of the production process - from extraction to refining to sale at the pump, enabling them to foreclose competition," says an outline of Edward's energy plan. Edwards' call for a major shift away from oil use would include, according to the document: - An increase of federal auto fuel economy requirements to 40 miles per gallon from the current 27.5 mpg by 2016. - Expansion of the use of biofuels such as ethanol, including a requirement for oil companies to make available E-85 fuel (which has 85 percent ethanol) at a quarter of their stations. Edwards wants all new cars to be able to use E-85 by 2010. - Mandatory restrictions on emissions of carbon dioxide with an aim to cut CO2 and other greenhouse gases by 80 percent by mid-century. - Creation of a $13 billion energy fund from the sale of greenhouse gas permits and ending some tax breaks for the oil industry. The money would be used to support biofuels and conservation technologies. Many of Edwards' proposals - from cutting greenhouse gas emissions to investigating oil industry consolidation - have been the subject of numerous hearings in Congress this years, as has calls by Democrats to make automobiles more fuel efficient. Rival Democratic presidential candidates, including Sens. Hillary Clinton and Barack Obama, also have called for expanded use of ethanol and other measures to reduce the country's reliance on oil. But Edwards' message may resonate especially in California, the nation's most delegate-rich state, which has perennially high gasoline prices. On Wednesday, the average regular-grade gasoline in California was $3.41 per gallon, according to the AAA Daily Fuel Gauge Report. The national average was $3.20 per gallon, compared to $2.85 a year ago. But Tupper Hull, spokesman for the Sacramento-based Western States Petroleum Association, said the prices reflected market rates, and an antitrust investigation would be a waste of time. He said the industry has been the subject of more than 20 state and federal investigations over the past two decades. (This version CORRECTS SUBS 5th graf to correct 40 mpg, sted 45. Event scheduled for 4:30 p.m. EDT) 2007
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/SENATOR_LEUKEMIA?SITE=KYB66&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News From 4, 5:03 PM EDT Wyoming Senator in Serious Condition By MARY CLARE JALONICK AP Photo/J. Pat Carter Bush seeks democratic reform in Mideast NATO leaders agree to help train Iraqi forces Swede May Have Given Serb Spy NATO Data NATO Drone Crashes Into Kosovo House AP-Ipsos Poll: Bush and Congress Rep. Jefferson Indicted in Bribery Probe Indicted Lawmaker Always Fond of Cash Members of Congress Charged With Crimes Wyoming Senator in Serious Condition Senate to Resume Debate Over Immigration The 110th Congress' First 100 Hours Sen. Max Baucus: The AP Interview Mark Foley Scandal Timeline Harry Reid Land Deal Congressional Leadership Financial Disclosure Harry Reid's Ties to Abramoff DeLay and Blunt: Following the Money Congress Goes to Bat for Tribes (AP) -- Sen. Craig Thomas, a Wyoming Republican who has been battling leukemia, is listed in serious condition at Bethesda National Naval Medical Center. According to a statement from his office, Thomas' cancer has been resistant to a second round of chemotherapy and he is suffering from an infection in addition to the leukemia. Thomas, 74, is with his wife, Susan, his sons, Patrick and Greg, and daughter, Lexie, his office said. "At this difficult time, all we can do is give him as much love and support as possible," Susan Thomas said in the statement. The senator was first diagnosed with the disease just days before his November 2006 re-election to a third term. He immediately underwent treatment at the hospital, then returned to work last December, a month earlier than expected. Earlier this year, Thomas said he was feeling better than he had in a long time. But last month, he returned to the hospital for a second round of chemotherapy. "I'm resolved to do all I can to keep the leukemia in check," he said then. "I've been feeling very good over the last several months - even returning to my regular morning run. But I've always known that further treatments are common and could periodically be part of this thing." If Thomas were to die or resign, Gov. Dave Freudenthal, a Democrat, would appoint a successor from one of three finalists chosen by the state Republican party. Thomas was first elected to the Senate in 1994 after serving five years in the House. which this site is provided.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BUSH?SITE=KYB66&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News From 4, 4:32 PM EDT Bush Opens Europe Trip on Jarring Note AP White House Correspondent Bush Heads to G8 Summit the G-8? Explore an Interactive Primer PRAGUE, Czech Republic (AP) -- President Bush's European trip was jarred as it began Monday by deteriorating relations with Russia and threatening words from President Vladimir Putin. Bush and Putin will see each other at the annual summit of industrialized nations, beginning Wednesday at the Baltic Sea resort city of Heiligendamm, Germany. In a diplomatic poke in the eye at Putin, Bush bracketed the summit with stops in the Czech Republic and Poland - the two countries where the United States wants to build a missile defense system for Europe. Already complaining of being encircled by NATO's expansion, Putin said putting missile defenses on Russia's doorstep would ignite a new arms race. He threatened to retarget Russia's missiles toward Europe. Bush says the anti-missile program is intended to protect Europe from states like Iran and North Korea, but Putin said neither country possesses the rockets the American system is intended to shoot down. "It's a defense against something which does not exist," the Russian president said. "It would be funny if it was not so sad." Flying to Europe with Bush, National Security Adviser Steve Hadley reacted cautiously to Putin. "There has been some escalation in the rhetoric," he said. "We think that is not helpful. We would like to have a constructive dialogue with Russia on this issue. We have in the past." Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice urged Putin to cool down. "This isn't the Soviet Union and we need to drop the rhetoric that sounds like what the United States and the Soviet Union used to say about each other and realize it is the United States and Russia in a very different period," Rice said on the way to an Organization of American States meeting in Panama City, Panama. "It doesn't really help anybody to start threatening the Europeans," she said. "You cannot launch a threat at Europe that is separable from the United States." Bush and his wife, Laura, arrived late Monday evening. In his only address of an eight-day trip through six countries, Bush will make a speech on Tuesday about supporting global democratic aspirations. Hadley said Russia, accused of backpedaling on democracy, would come up in that speech because "there are no exceptions to the freedom agenda." "So obviously when we look for the progress of freedom and democracy we look for the progress of freedom and democracy in Russia and China," Hadley said. Putin's sharp words at Washington - and Britain, as well - set an unusually chilly tone for the three-day summit in Heiligendamm. Leaders of the eight participating countries - the United States, Britain, Russia, France, Germany, Italy, Canada and Japan - typically mask their differences in statements that have been watered down to find consensus. "The most interesting issue on the agenda, to me, is Russia and how the other seven will handle Mr. Putin, who is really the elephant in the room," said Simon Serfaty, a senior adviser to the Europe program at the Center for Strategic and International Studies. Aside from his sharp words at Washington, Putin also took a slap at Britain for seeking the extradition of a Russian businessman who is a suspect in the killing of former KGB agent Alexander Litvinenko. Putin called London's move "stupidity." German Chancellor Angela Merkel also had a run-in with Putin last month, criticizing Russia's crackdown on political opponents. In interviews before the trip, Bush called Putin "my friend" but said the U.S.-Russian relationship was complicated. "Vladimir Putin will tell me that Russia is a democracy and that he's advancing democracy," Bush said. "We have got some questions about that, of course." There is a growing list of irritants in the U.S.-Russian relationship. Russia is unhappy about a U.S.-backed bid for independence for Kosovo. The United States wants Putin to do more to press Iran to abandon its suspected nuclear weapons program. Seeking a better footing in the relationship, Putin has accepted Bush's invitation for a July 1-2 meeting at his family's compound in Kennebunkport, Maine. Bush was expected to face pressure in Heiligendamm over what is widely perceived as U.S. footdragging in combatting global warming. But the president tried to pre-empt critics with his proposal last week challenging major polluting countries to agree on a target for reducing greenhouse gases. Still, Bush's proposal to let each country decide how much to do leaves a gap between Washington on one side and Merkel and the European Union on the other. Merkel had hoped that concrete goals to reduce emissions would be a centerpiece of her leadership of the G-8. Hadley gave Merkel a diplomatic nudge to support Bush's stand. "It's not about upstaging Angela Merkel. Quite the contrary," Hadley said. "It is not an alternative to anybody's plan, but it is an effort to identify a way forward and, quite frankly, it's an opportunity for Angela Merkel to preside over a very successful G-8." Along with his stops in Prague, Poland and Heiligendamm, Bush will visit Italy, Albania and Bulgaria. which this site is provided.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/F/FRED_THOMPSON_INTERVIEW?SITE=KYB66&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News From 3, 1:17 PM EDT Fred Thompson Edging Toward 2008 Bid Va. (AP) -- Fred Thompson says the country faces different challenges now than it did when he spurned overtures to run for president in 2000, leading him to consider a return to politics. "I think that everybody was kind of sitting back, taking it easy and thinking that, you know, peace and prosperity were going to kind of last forever. I think we know better than that now," the former Tennessee senator told live in a more dangerous (time of) things that threaten our very existence, things that threaten our peace, things that threaten our economic stability." In an interview Saturday night before speaking to the Virginia GOP, Thompson would not talk in detail about why he believes he might make a good president or what his priorities would be. "I'd do lots of things," he said, declining to elaborate. During his 1994-2002 Senate tenure, he was considered a reliably conservative vote. But he had few significant legislative achievements and established a reputation as a less-than-hard worker. "That's one rap that you can cure," Thompson said. When pressed, he struggled to name his greatest accomplishment in the Senate. He said he managed the homeland security bill in the full Senate and added: "There were a lot of things. ... It doesn't always have to do with putting your name on a piece of legislation. There was an awful lot of bad legislation that I helped to stop for one thing." But, he said with a smile, "We'll have a chance to get into all that when I start telling everybody what a wonderful person I am. But we're not quite at that stage." At least not yet. After flirting with a candidacy for months, the former senator and actor known to millions as the tough prosecutor on NBC's "Law & Order" took the first formal step toward the race for the GOP nomination Friday in establishing a preliminary campaign committee. Thompson, however, said he still was not ready to commit to a 2008 campaign. "We've not made a final decision on it. But obviously we're thinking pretty seriously about it," he said. "Everybody who has an opportunity to make even a small difference in the course of the direction of the country has got to look at that very seriously." Among his considerations, he said, was making sure "the man fits the times." Despite his coyness, Thompson is all but certain to join the crowded GOP field led by Rudy Giuliani, John McCain and Mitt Romney. Thompson's entrance could come as early as July. Fundraising was expected to begin in earnest Monday. Headquarters are planned for Nashville, Tenn., and the Washington, D.C., area. A campaign team is forming. Tentative visits to Iowa, New Hampshire and other early primary states are in the works. A Washington Post poll published Sunday found that Giuliani remained the front-runner, but suggested his popularity could be showing signs of stalling because of his support for abortion rights and gay rights. Thompson's candidacy could quickly turn the contest into a four-way battle, according to the poll. Thompson, 64, said much has changed since he rejected calls to run for president in 2000. Encouraged by an effort to draft him into the 2008 race, Thompson said he now finds the prospect appealing for several reasons. "I am married now, have two children at home. I spend a lot of time thinking about the kind of world that they're going to grow up in, spend a lot of time talking to my wife about that," he said. "And I think the country's different. I think we have challenges now that we didn't have in 2000." He said that in the years since he left public office and focused on his acting career, he has maintained his interest in what is going on in the world. "It's ultimately up to the American people what they think about me," Thompson said. "I've never desired to hold the office, particularly. In fact, not at all. But, at this stage of things, I sometimes think that I do desire the opportunity to do some things that only a president can do." He said his ambivalence until now about the presidency ultimately might make him a better leader and, thus, a better fit for the White House than others. "If a person craves power for the sake of power, if he craves the office for the sake of holding the office, he's got his priorities mixed up," Thompson said. "It's a desire to do something not to be something." The Southerner with Hollywood star power and mostly conservative Senate credentials fares well in national popularity polls. But he would enter the race some six months after the top-tier trio. He trails them significantly in money and organization, raising questions about whether he can turn buzz on the Internet and in Washington into actual votes when the primaries begin in less than eight months. Undaunted, he belittled the notion that candidates can only be competitive if they have had a campaign organization in place for months and if they raise upward of $100 million this year. "I don't know who made those rules. I don't know who the experts are. I'm too late to follow those rules even if I wanted to, and I don't want to," Thompson said. "At the end of the day, the people have to be receptive to you and your message. It doesn't matter how many campaign advisers you've got or how much money you can spend. If it's meant to be, it'll be." which this site is provided.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MCCAIN_IMMIGRATION?SITE=KYB66&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News From 3, 6:50 PM EDT McCain Challenges Rivals on Immigration What's in the New Immigration Bill? An Interactive Primer Raid Captures Illegal Immigrants Shelters Provide Stability for Young Immigrants Power of Attorney Forms (Migrant Network Coalition) Emergency Contacts Forms (Migrant Network Coalition) Memo on Prosecution of Illegal Immigrants McCain, Romney Clash Over Immigration France Sets Quotas for Immigrant Arrests Senate to Resume Debate Over Immigration Illegal Students Await Immigration Plan McCain Challenges Rivals on Immigration Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand Latest Photos of John McCain McCain Challenges Rivals on Immigration McCain: Current Iraq Plan Is Best Option McCain, Romney Talk Immigration in Texas McCain to Push GOP on Government Reform CORAL GABLES, Fla. (AP) -- Sen. John McCain has a message for other Republican presidential candidates: Opposing an immigration bill for political gain will only worsen the problems of undocumented immigrants and an unsecured border. McCain plans to talk about the bill at an event here Monday, and excerpts of his prepared remarks take aim at other Republicans in the race. "I would hope they wouldn't play politics for their own interests if the cost of their ambition was to make this problem even harder to solve," McCain said in the prepared remarks obtained by is delivering his remarks in the Miami area, which has large Hispanic and Haitian populations considered sympathetic to immigrants. McCain is alone among major Republicans seeking the presidency in pushing for a compromise bill that would provide border security while allowing a path to legalization for many of the estimated 12 million undocumented immigrants. Mitt Romney and Rudy Giuliani - McCain's chief rivals - oppose the measure to varying degrees, even though they have made statements in the past in which they appeared to support a similar measure the Senate previously considered. "I make one pledge to you that I will keep no matter what. I will never conduct my campaign in such a way that it makes our country's most difficult challenges harder to solve. I hope you will hold all candidates to that same standard. Pandering for votes on this issue, while offering no solution to the problem, amounts to doing nothing," McCain said. "And doing nothing is silent amnesty." President Bush supports the bill, as does Florida Sen. Mel Martinez, who also serves as general chairman of the Republican National Committee. The issue has divided Republicans, many of whom criticize the bipartisan bill as rewarding illegal behavior. McCain stresses, however, that undocumented immigrants who declare themselves have to pass a criminal background check, pay fines and taxes, learn English and meet other requirements before eventually being offered the possibility of citizenship. "Critics of the bill attack this as amnesty and a special path to citizenship that is denied to lawful immigrants. Both charges are false," McCain said. which this site is provided.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CONGRESSMAN_PROBE?SITE=KYB66&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News From 4, 5:12 PM EDT Rep. Jefferson Indicted in Bribery Probe By LARA JAKES JORDAN AP Photo/Lauren Victoria Burke AP-Ipsos Poll: Bush and Congress Rep. Jefferson Indicted in Bribery Probe Indicted Lawmaker Always Fond of Cash Members of Congress Charged With Crimes Wyoming Senator in Serious Condition Senate to Resume Debate Over Immigration The 110th Congress' First 100 Hours Sen. Max Baucus: The AP Interview Mark Foley Scandal Timeline Harry Reid Land Deal Congressional Leadership Financial Disclosure Harry Reid's Ties to Abramoff DeLay and Blunt: Following the Money Congress Goes to Bat for Tribes against Rep. William Jefferson WASHINGTON (AP) -- Rep. William Jefferson, D-La., was indicted Monday on federal charges of racketeering, money-laundering and soliciting more than $400,000 in bribes in connection with years of trying to broker business deals in Africa. The charges came almost two years after investigators raided Jefferson's home in Washington and found $90,000 in cash stuffed in a box in his freezer. The indictment in federal court in Alexandria, Va., lists 16 alleged violations with prison terms totaling as much as 235 years. Jefferson is charged with racketeering, soliciting bribes, wire fraud, money laundering, obstruction of justice and conspiracy. He is the first sitting congressman to face charges under the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, which prohibits corporate bribery overseas. Jefferson is to be arraigned Friday in U.S. District Court in Alexandria. Jefferson is accused of soliciting bribes from 11 different companies for himself and his family, and also of bribing a Nigerian official. The scheme was complicated and Jefferson set up a front company to hide the money, prosecutors said. "But the essence of the charges are really very simple: Mr. Jefferson corruptly traded on his good office and on the Congress," said Chuck Rosenberg, the U.S. attorney for eastern Virginia. The 60-year-old Jefferson, whose Louisiana district includes New Orleans, has said little about the case publicly but has maintained his innocence. He was re-elected last year despite the investigation. Joseph Persichini, who leads FBI's Washington field office, called on the public to "take the time, read this charging document line by line, scheme by scheme, count by count. This case is about greed, power and arrogance." Jefferson, in New Orleans on Monday, could not immediately be reached for comment. His lawyer was planning an afternoon news conference. House Speaker Nancy Pelosi is expected to push this week for Jefferson to be stripped of his seat on the Small Business Committee, according to a leadership aide who spoke on condition of anonymity because the decision had not yet been announced. "If these charges are proven true, they constitute an egregious and unacceptable abuse of public trust and power," said Pelosi, D-Calif. "Democrats are committed to upholding a high ethical standard and eliminating corruption and unethical behavior from the Congress." House Republican Leader John Boehner of Ohio said Jefferson should be expelled from Congress if he is found guilty and refuses to resign. "The American people rightfully expect the highest ethical standards from their elected leaders," Boehner said. Two of Jefferson's associates have struck plea bargains with prosecutors and have been sentenced. Brett Pfeffer, a former congressional aide, admitted soliciting bribes on Jefferson's behalf and was sentenced to eight years in prison. Another Jefferson associate, Louisville, Ky., telecommunications executive Vernon Jackson, pleaded guilty to paying between $400,000 and $1 million in bribes to Jefferson in exchange for his assistance securing business deals in Nigeria and other African nations. Jackson was sentenced to more than seven years in prison. Both Pfeffer and Jackson agreed to cooperate in the case against Jefferson. The impact of the case has stretched across continents and even roiled presidential politics in Nigeria. According to court records, Jefferson told associates he needed cash to pay bribes to the country's vice president, Atiku Abubakar. Abubakar denied the allegations, which figured prominently in that country's presidential elections in April. He ran for the presidency and finished third. The indictment does not name Abubakar. But it describes Jefferson's dealings with an unnamed "Nigerian Official A" who was a high-ranking official in Nigeria's executive branch who had a spouse in Potomac, Md. One of Abubakar's wives lived in that Washington suburb. Rosenberg would not confirm that person was Abubakar. In Lagos, Nigeria, Abubakar spokesman Garba Shehu said the former vice president "has always denied wrongdoing in the matter." "He has only had official interaction with the congressman, who the vice president felt deserved a hearing because he was a ranking member of the U.S. Congress," Shehu said. "The vice president was in no way cited in this thing, so we feel vindicated." Court records indicate Jefferson was videotaped taking a $100,000 cash bribe from an FBI informant. Most of that money later turned up in the freezer in Jefferson's home. In May 2006, the FBI raided Jefferson's congressional office, the first such raid on a congressman's Capitol office. That move sparked a constitutional debate over whether the executive branch stepped over a boundary. The raid's legality is still being argued on appeal. House leaders objected to the search, saying it was an unconstitutional intrusion on the lawmaking process. The FBI said the raid was necessary because Jefferson and his legal team had failed to respond to requests for documents. Some but not all the documents seized in the raid have been turned over Justice Department prosecutors. Assistant Attorney General Alice Fisher said the documents helped being the case against Jefferson. "Some of those documents that we were able to obtain through the process have indeed supported the charges that are presented today," Fisher said. Associated Press writers Cain Burdeau in New Orleans, Matthew Barakat in McLean, Va., and Edward Harris in Lagos, Nigeria, contributed to this report. which this site is provided.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/R/REPUBLICANS_IMMIGRATION?SITE=KYB66&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News From 4, 4:33 PM EDT McCain, Romney Clash Over Immigration What's in the New Immigration Bill? An Interactive Primer Raid Captures Illegal Immigrants Shelters Provide Stability for Young Immigrants Power of Attorney Forms (Migrant Network Coalition) Emergency Contacts Forms (Migrant Network Coalition) Memo on Prosecution of Illegal Immigrants McCain, Romney Clash Over Immigration France Sets Quotas for Immigrant Arrests Senate to Resume Debate Over Immigration Illegal Students Await Immigration Plan McCain Challenges Rivals on Immigration Take the October '06 Opinion Poll McCain, Romney Clash Over Immigration New Hampshire GOP Battle Each Other Some GOP Leaders Want More Candidates Analysis: Second GOP Debate Contentious GOP Hopefuls Debate Abortion, Tax Cuts GABLES, Fla. (AP) -- Republican presidential hopefuls John McCain and Mitt Romney clashed on Monday over the immigration bill, with McCain embracing the measure as a practical solution and Romney dismissing it as unworkable. Speaking in politically crucial Florida, with its heavy concentration of Cuban and Haitian immigrants, McCain argued that while the bill is imperfect, it is an attempt to secure U.S. borders, help the economy and identify those who have entered the nation illegally. The four-term Arizona senator chided rivals who are trying to score points on the issue. McCain never mentioned any names but his target was obvious - Romney. "To want the office so badly that you would intentionally make our country's problems worse might prove you can read a poll or take a cheap shot, but it hardly demonstrates presidential leadership," McCain told members of the Greater Miami Chamber of Commerce. "The immigration approach proposed by Senators McCain and Kennedy falls short of a workable solution to an important problem," the former Massachusetts governor said in a statement. Romney said he respected McCain, but his opposition was based on a "principled disagreement about policies and priorities related to enforcement of our immigration laws." The immigration measure would tighten security on the Mexican border while allowing some of the 12 million illegal immigrants a chance to stay in the United States and eventually become citizens. President Bush has spoken out in favor of the bipartisan bill. Romney did not mention the president, instead describing the immigration approach of McCain and liberal icon Kennedy. McCain said Bush understands the political implications. "The president knows. He spent eight years as governor of Texas," McCain told his speech. "The Republican Party must address this issue, if, in my part of the country, we expect to attract Hispanic voters." McCain stands alone among the major candidates in supporting the bill. He has criticized Romney for opposing the measure based on provisions that would provide a path to legalization. "I will never conduct my campaign in such a way that it makes our country's most difficult challenges harder to solve. I hope you will hold all candidates to that same standard. Pandering for votes on this issue, while offering no solution to the problem, amounts to doing nothing. And doing nothing is silent amnesty," McCain said to loud applause. Another GOP rival, former New York city Mayor Rudy Giuliani, also opposes the bill, but has said he is willing to compromise on how to deal with the estimated 12 million illegal immigrants in the United States as long as he is satisfied all security issues are addressed. Romney has not offered a detailed plan on how he would handle illegal immigrants, but he said recently a priority would be to deport criminals and remove illegal immigrants from government assistance programs. Romney's response to the bill has varied with his audience. Most of his criticism has focused on the so-called Z-visa, a document proposed for registering the estimated 12 million illegal aliens in the country. Last month in South Carolina, home to the type of social conservatives Romney is courting, he said, "I think we should not call it the 'Z' visa; we should call it the 'A' visa, because it's amnesty and that's what it stands for." Yet a week later in Florida, he said, "There are some who get involved in whether it is technically amnesty or not and I'm not really trying to define what is technically amnesty. I'll let the lawyers do that." Despite his amnesty complaints, Romney said he would not favor rounding up the illegal immigrants already in the country. Rather, he supports them self-reporting to immigration authorities. McCain chose a supportive crowd to deliver his 25-minute address Monday. Many of the Miami area's business leaders are immigrants or children of immigrants. He was given an extended ovation before beginning his speech and his remarks were interrupted several times by applause. "Florida is a living testament to the benefits of immigration, a great and prosperous state built in large part by immigrants who came here to escape tyranny and despair," he said. which this site is provided.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/A/AUTHENTICITY_CAMPAIGN?SITE=KYB66&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News From 4, 4:18 PM EDT Analysis: the 2008 Authenticity Race New Senate Leadership The New House Leadership 2006 House Race Results 2006 Senate Race Results Congress 2007: What if Democrats Take Over? 2006 Governor Race Results Voter Attitudes: Take the Poll Election Day in America McCain, Romney Clash Over Immigration Huckabee: Thompson Buzz Like Cartoon Analysis: the 2008 Authenticity Race Analysis: Leadership in Debate Forefront McCain Challenges Rivals on Immigration Fred Thompson Edging Toward 2008 Bid Candidates Compete at Iowa Dinner Testing Waters, Thompson Assails Dems New Hampshire GOP Battle Each Other Iraq? Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand WASHINGTON (AP) -- Can you fake authenticity? Probably not, but it might be worth a try if you're running for president at a time when voters think leaders lack integrity. Democrats cast themselves as courageous truth-tellers in their presidential debate Sunday night. Republicans debating Tuesday night might make the same claim. But if recent history is a guide, both fields will be bereft of authentic authenticity. "There is an overarching lack of trust in anybody with power," said Democratic strategist Stephanie Cutter. "It's not just President Bush. It's Congress. It's our CEOs. It's Hollywood. It's Wall Street. There's just an overwhelming lack of trust with authority and the people who have it." Any politician with a pollster knows that the public is particularly jaded toward Washington. From the Vietnam War, Watergate, Iran-contra and President Clinton's impeachment to runaway deficits, soaring health care costs and Hurricane Katrina, people have been fed a steady diet of scandal and misinformation from the federal government. Americans are also better educated and - thanks to the Internet - better informed than ever, which helps them spot a phony. They want the real deal. It will be interesting to see what this skeptical electorate thinks of former Sen. John Edwards, a Democrat who has apologized for his 2002 vote to authorize the war in Iraq - and now wears his mea culpa as a badge of honor. "He was right," Edwards said Sunday night, pointing to Sen. Barack Obama of Illinois who opposed the war from the start. "And I was wrong." Edwards is breaking an unwritten rule in Washington to never to acknowledge misjudgment, one that Sen. Hillary Rodham Clinton treats as gospel. He hopes to make her pay for refusing to apologize for her vote on Iraq. "I think it is important for anybody who seeks to be the next president of the United States, given the dishonesty that we've been faced with over the last several years, to be honest (with) the country," the former North Carolina senator said. Edwards was referring to Bush, whose credibility crumbled in the eyes of most voters after his 2004 re-election. Bush's two biggest problems: The war in Iraq, which began as a fruitless hunt for weapons of mass destruction, and Hurricane Katrina in 2005, which exposed a wide gap between administration rhetoric and reality. Earlier this year, just four in 10 Americans consider the president honest and ethical, down from 63 percent in July 2001, according to ABC News/Washington Post polling. In no small measure, Bush has helped usher in the era of authenticity. "I think we're living in a post-Bush world where authenticity is going to rule the day," said Republican strategist Scott Reed, who ran Bob Dole's 1996 presidential campaign. "Everybody has had it with the whistling, don't-worry-be-happy song and is looking for some real straight talk and some authenticity. Actions have consequences." John McCain learned that lesson. Some of his own advisers say the Arizona senator damaged his straight-talking image by bending over backward to appease conservative interests groups that dominate the GOP nomination fight. But he now hopes to get credit for supporting a compromise immigration bill that is unpopular with conservatives. "Pandering for votes on this issue, while offering no solution to the problem, amounts to doing nothing," McCain said to loud applause during a pre-debate address Monday. "And doing nothing is silent amnesty." One of his rivals, former New York Mayor Rudy Giuliani, has refused to budge from his abortion rights views despite warnings that social conservatives could scuttle his bid. Former Sen. Fred Thompson of Tennessee is plotting a GOP presidential bid, casting himself as a regular guy who tells it like it is. "Thompson gets it," Reed said of the authenticity angle. "He's not in the middle of Washington and doesn't have all the congressional stink. He certainly doesn't have the Bush smell. He comes across as a fresh face." McCain acknowledges that most Americans disagree with his support for Bush on the Iraq war, but he likes to say, "I'd would rather lose an election than lose a war." Democratic candidate Joe Biden seemed to channel McCain when he explained his vote in favor of extending congressional payment for the war, an unpopular stand among fervent Democrats. "Some things," the Delaware senator said Sunday, "are worth losing elections over." Biden's rivals would say they agree with that high-minded sentiment. But three of them - Edwards, Clinton and Sen. Chris Dodd of Connecticut - voted to give Bush the OK to invade Iraq when it was politically expedient to do so, and now they are trying to distance themselves from the unpopular war. Were they authentic then, or now - or possibly both? Count on voters to weigh that question in 2008. EDITOR'S NOTE: Ron Fournier has covered politics for nearly 20 years. which this site is provided.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/D/DEMOCRATS_DEBATE?SITE=KYB66&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News From 4, 9:32 AM EDT Analysis: Leadership in Debate Forefront AP Photo/Edward M. Pio Roda Iraq Dominates First NH Dem Debate Democrats Debate the Economy Democrats Debate the War on Terror Democrats Debate Immigration Reform Democrats Debate Universal Health Care N.H. (AP) -- Questions of courage and political leadership emerged at the latest Democratic debate, as John Edwards forcefully challenged front-runners Hillary Rodham Clinton and Barack Obama over whether they had demonstrated leadership on key issues. Two long-shot hopefuls - Mike Gravel and Dennis Kucinich - denounced what they called the lack of leadership by congressional Democrats after voters returned them to power last November. With a new Washington Post/ABC News poll showing Clinton far ahead of her rivals nationally, the former first lady projected an air of confidence and a mastery of the subject matter at Sunday's forum. She also insisted Democrats should focus their policy critiques on Republicans, especially President Bush. "The differences among us are minor. The differences between us and Republicans are major, and we don't want anybody in America to be confused," she said. She chuckled as her rivals were quizzed over what role her husband, former President Bill Clinton, would play in a Democratic administration. The consensus: He'd be a roving global ambassador. Obama, who in the first debate in late April appeared nervous and insufficiently prepared, had a smoother delivery this time and a more detailed grasp of policy issues. So it was left to Edwards, struggling to catch up to Clinton and Obama in most national polls, to throw the sharpest elbows, accusing them of being passive and cautious on urgent issues, like Iraq, health care and gay rights. "The job of the president of the United States is not to legislate but to lead," he said - a point he repeated several times. One strategist said Edwards' approach was bold but potentially dangerous. "John Edwards clearly has a new strategy to isolate Senator Clinton and defuse Senator Obama on the war and other key issues," Democratic strategist Stephanie Cutter said. "It's a smart but risky strategy to differentiate from others to maintain top-tier status, but it's a fine line between aggressive and desperate." Edwards applauded Clinton and Obama for voting last week against legislation to fund military operations in Iraq after a timeline for removing troops was stripped from the bill. But he said the votes didn't demonstrate the level of political leadership voters expect. His rivals, Edwards said, "did not say anything about how they were going to vote ... they were among the last people to vote," Edwards said. "I think all of us have a responsibility to lead on these issues." Edwards, a former North Carolina senator, voted in 2002 to authorize military action in Iraq and was a forceful defender of the war during his first presidential bid in 2004. That led Obama, who as an Illinois state senator opposed the war before it started, to jab back at Edwards. "You're about four and a half years late on leadership on this issue," Obama said. Obama and Edwards also tangled over details of their respective health care plans, with Edwards arguing that Obama's proposal would not provide universal coverage. Obama said his plan focused primarily on bringing down costs and said that mandatory health coverage was meaningless if consumers couldn't afford to pay for it. Clinton stood quietly between the two as they bickered, letting through an occasional bemused smile for the cameras. Edwards had tough words for the former first lady, too, batting back her contention that the differences among the candidates were unimportant. "There are differences between us, and I think Democratic voters deserve to know the differences between us," he said. Clinton lobbed back at Edwards over his contention that the war on terror is little more than a "bumper sticker" slogan. "I am a senator from New York. I have lived with the aftermath of 9/11, and I have seen firsthand the terrible damage that can be inflicted on our country by a small band of terrorists," she said. With the so-called "top-tier" candidates - Clinton, Obama and Edwards - grabbing the most screen time during the debate, Sens. Chris Dodd and Joe Biden and New Mexico Gov. Bill Richardson did what they could to break through. They got a chance when all eight candidates were asked what their top priority would be for their first 100 days in office. - Edwards: "travel the world" and "re-establish America's moral authority." - Clinton: bring home U.S. troops from Iraq. - Obama: bring home U.S. troops and push for national health care. - New Mexico Gov. Bill Richardson: upgrade U.S. schools and push a $40,000-a-year minimum wage for teachers. - Delaware Sen. Joe Biden: end the war in Iraq and defuse tensions with Iran and North Korea. - Ohio Rep. Dennis Kucinich: help "reshape the world for peace" and end all nuclear weapons. - Former Alaska Sen. Mike Gravel: Remind Congressional leaders they can end the war in Iraq now. - Connecticut Sen. Chris Dodd: "Restore constitutional rights in this country." Richardson also stressed his efforts to expand health insurance in his state and criticized the immigration bill moving through Congress, while Biden displayed his knowledge of global affairs as head of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee. Dodd outlined his proposal for energy independence, which he has tried to make the signature issue of his presidential bid. Beth Fouhy covers presidential politics for which this site is provided.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/G/GUANTANAMO_TRIALS?SITE=KYB66&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News From 4, 5:12 PM EDT Guantanamo Judge Dismisses Terror Case By ANDREW O. SELSKY From Suburbia to Guantanamo: The Odyssey of Majid Khan Assault with Bodily Fluids Failure to Follow Rules Hicks' stipulation of fact Pentagon acknowledges Geneva Convention protections D.O.D. list of Gitmo detainees Detainee Usama Hassan Ahmend Abu Kabir: I like my watch because it is durable Detainee Abdul Matin: Younger men and women use this watch everywhere Unnamed detainee: It's a watch. I use it like a watch Feroz Ali Abbasi's handwritten note released by the Pentagon Summarized sworn detainee statement released by the Pentagon Guantanamo Judge Dismisses Terror Case Apparent Gitmo Suicide Was Saudi Veteran Detainee Appeals for Reporter's Release Gitmo Detainee Fears Returning to Jordan US Commander: Guantanamo More Controlled Criminal complaint against Eljvir Duka in Fort Dix plot case Hearing Transcript: Waleed Mohammed bin Attash Hearing Transcript: Khalid Sheikh Mohammed Hearing Transcript Abu Faraj al-Libi Hearing Transcript: Ramzi Binalshibh Declassified Report: Iraq 'Cause Celebre' for Extremists Group Denies Link to NYC Terror Plot Informant Helped Bust Alleged JFK Plot Man Jailed After False Terror Threat U.S. Warns of Terror in Philippine Towns Gordon Brown Plans New Anti-Terror Laws BAY NAVAL BASE, Cuba (AP) -- A military judge dismissed terrorism-related charges Monday against a prisoner charged with killing an American soldier in Afghanistan, delivering a blow to the Bush administration's attempt to try Guantanamo detainees in military courts. The ruling raised questions about whether the U.S. would have to further revise procedures for prosecuting prisoners, leading to major delays. The chief of military defense attorneys at Guantanamo Bay argued that the ruling could spell the end of the war-crimes trial system set up last year by Congress and President Bush after the Supreme Court threw out the previous system. But a law professor said it appeared the judge left open the possibility of filing new charges. A military prosecutor said the ruling would be appealed, and the U.S. military entity responsible for holding the military trials said it believed Congress intended to grant jurisdiction to try suspected Taliban and al-Qaida members and supporters. Canadian detainee Omar Khadr, who was 15 when he was captured after a deadly firefight in Afghanistan and who is now 20, will remain at the remote U.S. military base along with some 380 other men suspected of links to al-Qaida and the Taliban. The judge, Army Col. Peter Brownback, said he had no choice but to throw out the Khadr case because he had been classified as an "enemy combatant" by a military panel years earlier - and not as an "alien unlawful enemy combatant." The Military Commissions Act, signed by Bush last year, says only those classified as "unlawful" enemy combatants can face war trials here, Brownback noted during the arraignment in a hilltop courtroom. Later Monday, a lawyer representing the only other detainee charged with war crimes, Salim Ahmed Hamdan, asked another military judge to throw out that case, based on the Khadr ruling. The judge, Navy Capt. Keith Allred, called a recess before the prosecutor could make a statement. Marine Col. Dwight Sullivan, head of the Guantanamo defense attorneys, said the dismissal in the Khadr case would have "huge" impact because none of the detainees held at this isolated military base in southeast Cuba has been found to be an "unlawful" enemy combatant. "It is not just a technicality; it's the latest demonstration that this newest system just does not work," Sullivan told journalists. "It is a system of justice that does not comport with American values." Sullivan said that in order to reclassify the detainees as "unlawful" combatants, the whole review system would have to be overhauled, a time-consuming act. The Pentagon said the issue was little more than semantics. A spokesman said the system was not dealing with lawful combatants, who fight in uniform for a national army. It was set up to determine if a detainee acted as an "unlawful enemy combatant" who was not in an internationally recognized military, did not wear a uniform or rank insignia, did not carry arms openly and was not a party to the Geneva Conventions, he said. "It is our belief that the concept was implicit that all the Guantanamo detainees who were designated as `enemy combatants' ... were in fact unlawful," Navy Cmdr. Jeffrey Gordon told Tobias, a law professor at the University of Richmond, said that because Brownback dismissed the case without prejudice, the U.S. may be able to retry Khadr. He also said it is unclear whether all detainees would have to be reclassified. A military spokeswoman, Army Maj. Beth Kubala, said the prosecution had five days in which to file an appeal. But Sullivan said the court designated to hear any appeal - known as the court of military commissions review - doesn't even exist. Kubala told AP Television News that Brownback's ruling underscored the fairness of the system. "The military commissions procedures and rules are robust and grant significant rights to the accused," she said. The only other Guantanamo detainee currently charged with crimes is Hamdan, who is accused of chauffeuring Osama bin Laden and being the al-Qaida chief's bodyguard. The third detainee charged under the new system, Australian David Hicks, pleaded guilty in March to providing material support to al-Qaida and is serving a nine-month sentence in Australia. Brownback's ruling came just minutes into Khadr's arraignment on charges he committed murder in violation of the law of war, attempted murder in violation of the law of war, conspiracy, providing material support for terrorism and spying. Khadr allegedly killed a U.S. Army soldier with a grenade in the firefight, in which he was wounded. He appeared in the courtroom with a beard and wearing an olive-green prison uniform. "The charges are dismissed without prejudice," Brownback pronounced as he adjourned the proceeding. A prosecutor, Army Capt. Keith Petty, said he had been prepared to show Khadr was an unlawful combatant because he fought for al-Qaida, and videotapes showed Khadr making and planting explosives targeting American soldiers. Khadr seemed oblivious to the ruling. He calmly watched the judge throw out the case - looking not at Brownback but at a computer screen at the defense table that showed a live TV broadcast of the proceedings. Khadr could see himself on the screen The U.S. military has hoped to accelerate its prosecutions of Guantanamo detainees, with the Pentagon saying it expects to eventually charge about 80 of the 380 prisoners held at this isolated base, but questions lingered about the legitimacy of the process. The Supreme Court, ruling in favor of a lawsuit brought by Hamdan, last June threw out a previous military tribunal system that was set up in the wake of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks, calling it unconstitutional. Congress responded with new guidelines for war-crimes trials and Bush signed them into law. Hamdan's attorney, Navy Lt. Cmdr. Charles Swift, told he will challenge the new system as unconstitutional. For example, the Military Commissions Act retroactively made certain acts, such as conspiracy a crime, Swift said. "This case raises significant questions" about the separation of powers, Swift said. "Congress cannot violate the Constitution to fix things ... but they are backdating anything and making it a crime." Hamdan is charged with conspiracy - centered on his alleged membership in al-Qaida and purported role in plotting to attack civilians and civilian targets - and with providing material support for terrorism. As part of the second charge, Hamdan is accused of transporting at least one SA-7 surface-to-air missile to shoot down U.S. and coalition military aircraft in Afghanistan in November 2001. The son of an alleged al-Qaida financier, Khadr is accused of killing U.S. Army Sgt. Christopher Speer with a grenade during a firefight in Afghanistan on July 27, 2002. Khadr's attorneys said he was a child soldier and should be rehabilitated, not imprisoned. "The U.S. will be the first country in modern history to try an individual who was a child at the time of the alleged war crimes," the attorneys said in a joint statement in April. which this site is provided.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/O/ON_THE_2008_TRAIL?SITE=KYB66&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News From 4, 4:22 PM EDT Huckabee: Thompson Buzz Like Cartoon Global Warming? Gay Marriage? See Where the Candidates Stand CONCORD, N.H. (AP) -- Republican presidential hopeful Mike Huckabee said Monday the buzz about Fred Thompson's expected entry into the race reminds him of a cartoon superhero - Mighty Mouse. "There is this almost created sense of this Mighty Mouse candidacy, 'Here I come to save the day,'" Huckabee told reporters after giving a speech at a financial services company. "In the end, voters are not necessarily looking for someone to come in and save the day." Huckabee said voters are looking for consistency and authenticity - a veiled jab at rival Republicans who have changed positions throughout their careers. Thompson, the "Law & Order" actor, is edging closer to a full-blown candidacy that could shake up the GOP field. He leads Huckabee and others in the crowded second tier of the Republican field in some polls. The former Arkansas governor said history teaches that great expectations often fizzle. "For most (such) situations, there is certainly this buildup anticipation of people until they actually enter the race. Then it's, 'OK, let's go find someone else to go get excited about,'" Huckabee said. He cited the anticipation four years ago as retired four-star Gen. Wesley Clark edged closer to his presidential announcement. "He got in, and things never really got any better. The best it was, was the day before he made the announcement," Huckabee said of the unsuccessful Democratic candidate. which this site is provided.
